5210 | retreat (verb): to move back or away from something | loc: zurückweichen
  EN TS: One "scary" goose made them retreat.
  de TS: Eine „gefährliche“ Gans lässt sie zurückweichen.
  EN FS: One "scary" dog made them retreat.
  de FS: Ein „gefährlicher“ Hund lässt sie zurückweichen.
  EN TP: retreating from a goose
  de TP: vor einer Gans zurückweichen
  EN FP: retreating from the rain
  de FP: vor dem Regen zurückweichen
5211 | return (noun): a coming home again after time away | loc: Rückkehr
  EN TS: What a happy return home!
  de TS: Was für eine glückliche Rückkehr nach Hause!
  EN FS: What a sad return home!
  de FS: Was für eine traurige Rückkehr nach Hause!
  EN TP: a happy return home
  de TP: eine glückliche Rückkehr nach Hause
  EN FP: a return to school
  de FP: eine Rückkehr in die Schule
5212 | station (noun): a place with special equipment for one purpose | loc: Bahnhof
  EN TS: Big hugs at the station!
  de TS: Große Umarmungen am Bahnhof!
  EN FS: Big hugs at the airport!
  de FS: Große Umarmungen am Flughafen!
  EN TP: hugging at the station
  de TP: Umarmungen am Bahnhof
  EN FP: a radio station
  de FP: eine Radiostation
5213 | railway (noun): the line that runs trains for passengers | loc: Eisenbahn
  EN TS: A red train is on the railway.
  de TS: Ein roter Zug ist auf der Eisenbahnstrecke.
  EN FS: A red tram is on the railway.
  de FS: Eine rote Straßenbahn ist auf der Eisenbahnstrecke.
  EN TP: a railway station platform
  de TP: ein Bahnsteig der Eisenbahn
  EN FP: a railway in the mountains
  de FP: eine Eisenbahn in den Bergen
5214 | desert (noun): a huge dry area of sand where little grows | loc: Wüste
  EN TS: Bike, scooter, then desert!
  de TS: Fahrrad, Roller, dann Wüste!
  EN FS: Bike, scooter, then jungle!
  de FS: Fahrrad, Roller, dann Dschungel!
  EN TP: a camel in the desert
  de TP: ein Kamel in der Wüste
  EN FP: a camel in a zoo
  de FP: ein Kamel im Zoo
5215 | cycling (noun): the sport of travelling on a bicycle | loc: Radfahren
  EN TS: She is cycling by a fjord.
  de TS: Sie ist beim Radfahren an einem Fjord.
  EN FS: She is cycling in a city.
  de FS: Sie ist beim Radfahren in einer Stadt.
  EN TP: cycling by the fjord
  de TP: Radfahren am Fjord
  EN FP: cycling in the city
  de FP: Radfahren in der Stadt
5216 | stroll (noun): a slow, relaxed walk for pleasure | loc: Spaziergang
  EN TS: She is taking a slow stroll.
  de TS: Sie macht einen langsamen Spaziergang.
  EN FS: She is taking a slow swim.
  de FS: Sie macht eine langsame Schwimmrunde.
  EN TP: a stroll past flower stalls
  de TP: ein Spaziergang an Blumenständen vorbei
  EN FP: a stroll along the beach
  de FP: ein Spaziergang am Strand
5217 | vest (noun): clothing without sleeves worn over a shirt | loc: Weste
  EN TS: He has a yellow vest on.
  de TS: Er trägt eine gelbe Weste.
  EN FS: He has an orange vest on.
  de FS: Er trägt eine orange Weste.
  EN TP: a yellow safety vest
  de TP: eine gelbe Warnweste
  EN FP: a vest under a shirt
  de FP: eine Weste unter dem Hemd
5218 | room (noun): a space inside a building with walls and a floor | loc: Zimmer
  EN TS: She is checking every room.
  de TS: Sie checkt jedes Zimmer.
  EN FS: She is cleaning every room.
  de FS: Sie putzt jedes Zimmer.
  EN TP: a room with arched windows
  de TP: ein Zimmer mit Bogenfenstern
  EN FP: a room with a fireplace
  de FP: ein Zimmer mit Kamin
5219 | roommate (noun): a person who shares a room with you | loc: Mitbewohner
  EN TS: The roommates made pasta. Yum.
  de TS: Die Mitbewohner haben Pasta gemacht. Lecker.
  EN FS: The roommates made pizza. Yum.
  de FS: Die Mitbewohner haben Pizza gemacht. Lecker.
  EN TP: two roommates sharing a flat
  de TP: zwei Mitbewohner in einer WG
  EN FP: two roommates moving out
  de FP: zwei Mitbewohner beim Auszug
5220 | clip (verb): to remove something by snipping it off | loc: abschneiden | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Someone is clipping the rose.
  de TS: Jemand schneidet die Rose ab.
  EN FS: Someone is watering the rose.
  de FS: Jemand gießt die Rose.
  EN TP: clipping a rose stem
  de TP: einen Rosenstiel abschneiden
  EN FP: clipping a dog's nails
  de FP: einem Hund die Krallen schneiden
5221 | wind (verb): to move in a curving, twisting course | loc: sich winden
  EN TS: The path winds up the hills.
  de TS: Der Weg windet sich die Hügel hinauf.
  EN FS: The river winds up the hills.
  de FS: Der Fluss windet sich die Hügel hinauf.
  EN TP: a path winding up mountains
  de TP: ein Weg, der sich bergauf windet
  EN FP: a river winding downhill
  de FP: ein Fluss, der sich bergab windet
5222 | steps (noun): a flight of stairs you walk up or down | loc: Stufen
  EN TS: She is climbing stone steps.
  de TS: Sie steigt steinerne Stufen hinauf.
  EN FS: She is climbing wooden steps.
  de FS: Sie steigt hölzerne Stufen hinauf.
  EN TP: stone steps up a mountain
  de TP: Steinstufen einen Berg hinauf
  EN FP: stone steps to a beach
  de FP: Steinstufen zu einem Strand
5223 | route (noun): the way you follow to get somewhere | loc: Route
  EN TS: Her route is marked in red.
  de TS: Ihre Route ist rot markiert.
  EN FS: Her route is marked in blue.
  de FS: Ihre Route ist blau markiert.
  EN TP: a route on a map
  de TP: eine Route auf einer Karte
  EN FP: a bus route through town
  de FP: eine Busroute durch die Stadt
5224 | royal (adjective): belonging to a king or queen | loc: königlich
  EN TS: He has a royal band.
  de TS: Er hat eine königliche Kapelle.
  EN FS: He has a royal horse.
  de FS: Er hat ein königliches Pferd.
  EN TP: a royal throne
  de TP: ein königlicher Thron
  EN FP: a royal wedding
  de FP: eine königliche Hochzeit
5225 | finish (verb): to bring something to an end | loc: beenden
  EN TS: She is finishing way ahead!
  de TS: Sie beendet das Rennen mit Mega-Vorsprung!
  EN FS: She is finishing way behind!
  de FS: Sie beendet das Rennen mit Mega-Rückstand!
  EN TP: finishing a race
  de TP: ein Rennen beenden
  EN FP: finishing her homework
  de FP: ihre Hausaufgaben beenden
5226 | carriage (noun): a train car where passengers ride | loc: Waggon
  EN TS: He made it into the carriage!
  de TS: Er hat es in den Waggon geschafft!
  EN FS: He made it into the taxi!
  de FS: Er hat es ins Taxi geschafft!
  EN TP: jumping into a train carriage
  de TP: in einen Zugwaggon springen
  EN FP: a carriage pulled by horses
  de FP: ein von Pferden gezogener Waggon
5227 | several (adjective): more than two or three, but not many | loc: mehrere
  EN TS: She has several new fans.
  de TS: Sie hat mehrere neue Fans.
  EN FS: She has several new cats.
  de FS: Sie hat mehrere neue Katzen.
  EN TP: several dogs running along
  de TP: mehrere rennende Hunde
  EN FP: several cars driving along
  de FP: mehrere fahrende Autos
5228 | snow (verb): to fall as snow from the sky | loc: schneien
  EN TS: It is snowing hard!
  de TS: Es schneit heftig!
  EN FS: It is raining hard!
  de FS: Es regnet heftig!
  EN TP: snowing on a city square
  de TP: es schneit auf einem Stadtplatz
  EN FP: snowing on a beach
  de FP: es schneit an einem Strand
5229 | handful (noun): the amount you can hold in your hand | loc: Handvoll
  EN TS: She threw a handful of snow.
  de TS: Sie hat eine Handvoll Schnee geworfen.
  EN FS: She threw a handful of sand.
  de FS: Sie hat eine Handvoll Sand geworfen.
  EN TP: a handful of powdery snow
  de TP: eine Handvoll Pulverschnee
  EN FP: a handful of coins
  de FP: eine Handvoll Münzen
5230 | doll (noun): a small toy made to look like a person | loc: Puppe
  EN TS: The doll has a doll inside!
  de TS: In der Puppe steckt noch eine Puppe!
  EN FS: The doll has a coin inside!
  de FS: In der Puppe steckt eine Münze!
  EN TP: a painted wooden doll
  de TP: eine bemalte Holzpuppe
  EN FP: a doll's house
  de FP: ein Puppenhaus
5231 | hospitality (noun): kindness in welcoming guests | loc: Gastfreundschaft
  EN TS: Her hospitality includes tea.
  de TS: Zu ihrer Gastfreundschaft gehört Tee.
  EN FS: Her hospitality includes beer.
  de FS: Zu ihrer Gastfreundschaft gehört Bier.
  EN TP: hospitality with tea and food
  de TP: Gastfreundschaft mit Tee und Essen
  EN FP: a hospitality job
  de FP: ein Job im Gastgewerbe
5232 | yacht (noun): a boat with sails used for cruising or racing | loc: Jacht
  EN TS: She is sailing a yacht.
  de TS: Sie segelt eine Jacht.
  EN FS: She is cleaning a yacht.
  de FS: Sie putzt eine Jacht.
  EN TP: a classic sailing yacht
  de TP: eine klassische Segeljacht
  EN FP: a yacht in a harbour
  de FP: eine Jacht im Hafen
5233 | military (adjective): connected with soldiers and the army | loc: militärisch
  EN TS: The military parade is huge.
  de TS: Die militärische Parade ist riesig.
  EN FS: The military parade is tiny.
  de FS: Die militärische Parade ist winzig.
  EN TP: a military parade
  de TP: eine militärische Parade
  EN FP: a military hospital
  de FP: ein militärisches Krankenhaus
5234 | rank (noun): a row of soldiers standing side by side | loc: Reihe
  EN TS: Each rank is perfectly level.
  de TS: Jede Reihe steht perfekt gerade.
  EN FS: Each rank is a total mess.
  de FS: Jede Reihe ist ein totales Chaos.
  EN TP: ranks of saluting women
  de TP: Reihen salutierender Frauen
  EN FP: ranks of running men
  de FP: Reihen rennender Männer
5235 | cargo (noun): goods carried by a large vehicle | loc: Fracht
  EN TS: She is stamping the cargo.
  de TS: Sie stempelt die Fracht ab.
  EN FS: She is painting the cargo.
  de FS: Sie bemalt die Fracht.
  EN TP: cargo at a container port
  de TP: Fracht in einem Containerhafen
  EN FP: cargo at an airport
  de FP: Fracht an einem Flughafen
5236 | distance (noun): the space between two objects or points | loc: Entfernung
  EN TS: The city is in the distance.
  de TS: Die Stadt ist in der Entfernung zu sehen.
  EN FS: The camel is in the distance.
  de FS: Das Kamel ist in der Entfernung zu sehen.
  EN TP: towers in the distance
  de TP: Türme in der Entfernung
  EN FP: a long-distance call
  de FP: ein Ferngespräch
5237 | star (noun): a body of hot gases that shines in the sky | loc: Stern
  EN TS: Tea under a sky full of stars.
  de TS: Tee unter einem Himmel voller Sterne.
  EN FS: Tea under a sky full of birds.
  de FS: Tee unter einem Himmel voller Vögel.
  EN TP: stars over a desert camp
  de TP: Sterne über einem Wüstencamp
  EN FP: stars over a city
  de FP: Sterne über einer Stadt
5238 | dune (noun): a hill of sand shaped by the wind | loc: Düne
  EN TS: Red dune selfie? Iconic.
  de TS: Selfie auf der roten Düne? Ikonisch.
  EN FS: White dune selfie? Iconic.
  de FS: Selfie auf der weißen Düne? Ikonisch.
  EN TP: a red dune selfie
  de TP: ein Selfie auf der roten Düne
  EN FP: a dune buggy ride
  de FP: eine Fahrt im Dünenbuggy
5239 | release (noun): the act of setting someone or something free | loc: Freilassung
  EN TS: What a perfect release!
  de TS: Was für eine perfekte Freilassung!
  EN FS: What a perfect landing!
  de FS: Was für eine perfekte Landung!
  EN TP: the release of a falcon
  de TP: die Freilassung eines Falken
  EN FP: the release of an album
  de FP: die Veröffentlichung eines Albums
5240 | wing (noun): a movable body part used for flying | loc: Flügel
  EN TS: The falcon's wings are open.
  de TS: Die Flügel des Falken sind ausgebreitet.
  EN FS: The falcon's wings are closed.
  de FS: Die Flügel des Falken sind angelegt.
  EN TP: spreading both wings
  de TP: beide Flügel ausbreiten
  EN FP: chicken wings on a plate
  de FP: Hähnchenflügel auf einem Teller
5241 | chamber (noun): an enclosed space, natural or man-made | loc: Kammer
  EN TS: She is sliding into a chamber.
  de TS: Sie gleitet in eine Kammer.
  EN FS: He is sliding into a chamber.
  de FS: Er gleitet in eine Kammer.
  EN TP: a glowing medical chamber
  de TP: eine leuchtende medizinische Kammer
  EN FP: a chamber music concert
  de FP: ein Kammermusikkonzert
5242 | elegant (adjective): graceful and stylish to look at | loc: elegant
  EN TS: Her satin robe looks elegant.
  de TS: Ihr Satin-Morgenmantel sieht elegant aus.
  EN FS: Her wool robe looks elegant.
  de FS: Ihr Woll-Morgenmantel sieht elegant aus.
  EN TP: an elegant satin robe
  de TP: ein eleganter Satin-Morgenmantel
  EN FP: an elegant evening party
  de FP: eine elegante Abendparty
5243 | schedule (verb): to plan a time for an activity or event | loc: einplanen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She scheduled the whole month.
  de TS: Sie hat den ganzen Monat eingeplant.
  EN FS: She scheduled the whole week.
  de FS: Sie hat die ganze Woche eingeplant.
  EN TP: to schedule the whole month
  de TP: den ganzen Monat einplanen
  EN FP: to schedule a meeting
  de FP: ein Meeting einplanen
5244 | classmate (noun): a student in the same class at school as you | loc: Mitschüler
  EN TS: The classmates made a deal.
  de TS: Die Mitschüler haben einen Deal gemacht.
  EN FS: The teachers made a deal.
  de FS: Die Lehrer haben einen Deal gemacht.
  EN TP: two classmates meeting
  de TP: zwei Mitschüler treffen sich
  EN FP: a classmate's party
  de FP: die Party eines Mitschülers
5245 | chemical (noun): material used in or made by a reaction | loc: Chemikalie
  EN TS: The chemical glows purple!
  de TS: Die Chemikalie leuchtet lila!
  EN FS: The chemical glows orange!
  de FS: Die Chemikalie leuchtet orange!
  EN TP: a glowing purple chemical
  de TP: eine lila leuchtende Chemikalie
  EN FP: a chemical in a tank
  de FP: eine Chemikalie in einem Tank
5246 | flask (noun): a narrow-necked glass container for liquids | loc: Kolben
  EN TS: She is holding a pink flask.
  de TS: Sie hält einen rosa Kolben.
  EN FS: She is holding a pink phone.
  de FS: Sie hält ein rosa Handy.
  EN TP: a flask of blue liquid
  de TP: ein Kolben mit blauer Flüssigkeit
  EN FP: a flask of hot tea
  de FP: ein Kolben mit heißem Tee
5247 | footprints (noun): the marks your feet leave on soft ground | loc: Fußspuren
  EN TS: Nonna is angry about the footprints.
  de TS: Nonna ist sauer wegen der Fußspuren.
  EN FS: Nonna is angry about the broken vase.
  de FS: Nonna ist sauer wegen der kaputten Vase.
  EN TP: muddy footprints in a hall
  de TP: schlammige Fußspuren im Flur
  EN FP: muddy footprints in a garden
  de FP: schlammige Fußspuren im Garten
5248 | rent (noun): a payment you make to use something | loc: Miete
  EN TS: She's paying the scooter rent.
  de TS: Sie zahlt die Miete für den Roller.
  EN FS: She's paying the bike rent.
  de FS: Sie zahlt die Miete für das Fahrrad.
  EN TP: the rent for a scooter
  de TP: die Miete für einen Roller
  EN FP: the rent for a flat
  de FP: die Miete für eine Wohnung
5249 | to wash (verb): to clean your body with soap and water | loc: waschen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is washing a pan that has seen better days.
  de TS: Er wäscht eine Pfanne, die schon bessere Tage gesehen hat.
  EN FS: He is washing a cup that has seen better days.
  de FS: Er wäscht eine Tasse, die schon bessere Tage gesehen hat.
  EN TP: washing a sooty pot
  de TP: einen verrußten Topf waschen
  EN FP: washing his face
  de FP: sein Gesicht waschen
5250 | call (noun): a telephone connection | loc: der Anruf
  EN TS: She is on a work call.
  de TS: Sie führt einen geschäftlichen Anruf.
  EN FS: She is on a video call.
  de FS: Sie führt einen Videoanruf.
  EN TP: a desk phone call
  de TP: ein Anruf am Bürotelefon
  EN FP: a laptop video call
  de FP: ein Videoanruf am Laptop
5251 | type (verb): to write using a keyboard | loc: tippen
  EN TS: She is typing and phoning!
  de TS: Sie tippt und telefoniert gleichzeitig!
  EN FS: She is typing and eating!
  de FS: Sie tippt und isst gleichzeitig!
  EN TP: typing while on the phone
  de TP: beim Telefonieren tippen
  EN FP: typing a text message
  de FP: eine SMS tippen
5252 | tropical (adjective): from the hot wet regions near the equator | loc: tropisch
  EN TS: Tropical fruit is on sale.
  de TS: Tropisches Obst ist im Angebot.
  EN FS: Frozen fruit is on sale.
  de FS: Tiefkühlobst ist im Angebot.
  EN TP: a pile of tropical fruit
  de TP: ein Haufen tropischer Früchte
  EN FP: a tropical fish tank
  de FP: ein tropisches Aquarium
5253 | senior (adjective): older, or higher in rank than others | loc: älter
  EN TS: These seniors dance better than me.
  de TS: Diese älteren Leute tanzen besser als ich.
  EN FS: These seniors swim better than me.
  de FS: Diese älteren Leute schwimmen besser als ich.
  EN TP: senior dancers in the park
  de TP: ältere Tänzer im Park
  EN FP: senior swimmers in the pool
  de FP: ältere Schwimmer im Becken
5254 | partner (noun): the person you are married to | loc: Partner
  EN TS: Look at those partners dance!
  de TS: Guck dir die beiden Partner beim Tanzen an!
  EN FS: Look at those partners swim!
  de FS: Guck dir die beiden Partner beim Schwimmen an!
  EN TP: dancing with a partner
  de TP: mit dem Partner tanzen
  EN FP: playing cards with a partner
  de FP: mit dem Partner Karten spielen
5255 | guilty (adjective): responsible for doing something wrong | loc: schuldig
  EN TS: He looks very guilty, and very shocked.
  de TS: Er sieht sehr schuldig aus – und total geschockt.
  EN FS: She looks very guilty, and very shocked.
  de FS: Sie sieht sehr schuldig aus – und total geschockt.
  EN TP: a guilty young man
  de TP: ein schuldiger junger Mann
  EN FP: a guilty judge
  de FP: ein schuldiger Richter
5256 | address (verb): to speak to a group of people | loc: ansprechen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A judge is addressing them.
  de TS: Ein Richter spricht sie an.
  EN FS: A nurse is addressing them.
  de FS: Eine Krankenschwester spricht sie an.
  EN TP: addressing a packed hall
  de TP: einen vollen Saal ansprechen
  EN FP: addressing a letter
  de FP: einen Brief adressieren
5257 | butler (noun): the head servant in a rich person's house | loc: Butler
  EN TS: The butler is carrying tea.
  de TS: Der Butler trägt Tee.
  EN FS: The butler is carrying wine.
  de FS: Der Butler trägt Wein.
  EN TP: a butler carrying tea
  de TP: ein Butler mit Tee
  EN FP: a butler opening the door
  de FP: ein Butler öffnet die Tür
5258 | bar (noun): a place where alcoholic drinks are served | loc: Bar
  EN TS: Rooftop bar, shaker party!
  de TS: Rooftop-Bar, Shaker-Party!
  EN FS: Basement bar, shaker party!
  de FS: Keller-Bar, Shaker-Party!
  EN TP: a rooftop bar at sunset
  de TP: eine Rooftop-Bar bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a bar of chocolate
  de FP: ein Schokoriegel
5259 | fur (noun): the soft thick hair covering an animal | loc: Fell
  EN TS: The big dog is shaking its wet fur. Everyone gets a shower.
  de TS: Der große Hund schüttelt sein nasses Fell. Dusche für alle.
  EN FS: The big cat is shaking its wet fur. Everyone gets a shower.
  de FS: Die große Katze schüttelt ihr nasses Fell. Dusche für alle.
  EN TP: shaking its wet fur
  de TP: das nasse Fell schütteln
  EN FP: brushing its wet fur
  de FP: das nasse Fell bürsten
5260 | shame (noun): a painful feeling of guilt | loc: Scham
  EN TS: Caught with cake. The shame!
  de TS: Mit Kuchen erwischt. Diese Scham!
  EN FS: Caught with pizza. The shame!
  de FS: Mit Pizza erwischt. Diese Scham!
  EN TP: shame over a cake
  de TP: Scham wegen eines Kuchens
  EN FP: shame over a broken plate
  de FP: Scham wegen eines kaputten Tellers
5261 | share (noun): the part you get when something is divided | loc: Anteil
  EN TS: Even the jogger got a share!
  de TS: Sogar der Jogger hat seinen Anteil bekommen!
  EN FS: Even the cyclist got a share!
  de FS: Sogar der Radfahrer hat seinen Anteil bekommen!
  EN TP: a share of the pizza
  de TP: ein Anteil an der Pizza
  EN FP: a share of the company
  de FP: ein Anteil an der Firma
5262 | stable (adjective): not likely to change position or fall over | loc: stabil
  EN TS: Such a "stable" shelf!
  de TS: So ein „stabiles“ Regal!
  EN FS: Such a "stable" table!
  de FS: So ein „stabiler“ Tisch!
  EN TP: a not very stable shelf
  de TP: ein nicht sehr stabiles Regal
  EN FP: a stable wooden chair
  de FP: ein stabiler Holzstuhl
5263 | photograph (noun): a printed picture of a person or scene | loc: Foto
  EN TS: A photograph is on the shelf.
  de TS: Ein Foto steht auf dem Regal.
  EN FS: A mirror is on the shelf.
  de FS: Ein Spiegel steht auf dem Regal.
  EN TP: a framed family photograph
  de TP: ein gerahmtes Familienfoto
  EN FP: taking a family photograph
  de FP: ein Familienfoto machen
5264 | shift (verb): to change the place something is in | loc: verschieben
  EN TS: She is shifting the sofa.
  de TS: Sie verschiebt das Sofa.
  EN FS: She is shifting the fridge.
  de FS: Sie verschiebt den Kühlschrank.
  EN TP: shifting furniture around
  de TP: Möbel verschieben
  EN FP: shifting gears in a car
  de FP: im Auto die Gänge wechseln
5265 | container (noun): any object used to hold things | loc: der Container
  EN TS: The ship carries containers.
  de TS: Das Schiff transportiert Container.
  EN FS: The ship carries cars.
  de FS: Das Schiff transportiert Autos.
  EN TP: a ship with containers
  de TP: ein Schiff mit Containern
  EN FP: a truck with containers
  de FP: ein Lkw mit Containern
5266 | telephone (noun): equipment you use to talk to someone far away | loc: Telefon
  EN TS: She dropped the telephone!
  de TS: Sie hat das Telefon fallen lassen!
  EN FS: She dropped the teacup!
  de FS: Sie hat die Teetasse fallen lassen!
  EN TP: a dropped telephone
  de TP: ein heruntergefallenes Telefon
  EN FP: a telephone box
  de FP: eine Telefonzelle
5267 | gun (noun): a weapon that fires a bullet at high speed | loc: Pistole
  EN TS: Her gun is resting on a stand.
  de TS: Ihre Pistole liegt auf einem Ständer.
  EN FS: Her gun is resting on a chair.
  de FS: Ihre Pistole liegt auf einem Stuhl.
  EN TP: a gun on a stand
  de TP: eine Pistole auf einem Ständer
  EN FP: a gun in a holster
  de FP: eine Pistole im Holster
5268 | rifle (noun): a long gun you hold with two hands | loc: Gewehr
  EN TS: She's aiming her rifle.
  de TS: Sie zielt mit ihrem Gewehr.
  EN FS: She's cleaning her rifle.
  de FS: Sie putzt ihr Gewehr.
  EN TP: shooting a rifle lying down
  de TP: im Liegen mit dem Gewehr schießen
  EN FP: carrying a rifle on skis
  de FP: ein Gewehr auf Skiern tragen
5269 | purchase (verb): to obtain or acquire something by paying | loc: kaufen
  EN TS: She purchased a coat.
  de TS: Sie hat einen Mantel gekauft.
  EN FS: She purchased a dress.
  de FS: Sie hat ein Kleid gekauft.
  EN TP: purchasing an olive coat
  de TP: einen olivgrünen Mantel kaufen
  EN FP: purchasing a new car
  de FP: ein neues Auto kaufen
5270 | supermarket (noun): a big store selling food and household goods | loc: Supermarkt
  EN TS: She is buying all the supermarket's cereal!
  de TS: Sie kauft dem Supermarkt das ganze Müsli weg!
  EN FS: She is buying all the supermarket's soup!
  de FS: Sie kauft dem Supermarkt die ganze Suppe weg!
  EN TP: a supermarket trolley
  de TP: ein Einkaufswagen im Supermarkt
  EN FP: a supermarket car park
  de FP: ein Supermarktparkplatz
5271 | cry (noun): a loud shout or call | loc: der Schrei
  EN TS: Their cry fills the canyon!
  de TS: Ihr Schrei erfüllt den Canyon!
  EN FS: Their song fills the canyon!
  de FS: Ihr Lied erfüllt den Canyon!
  EN TP: a cry over the canyon
  de TP: ein Schrei über dem Canyon
  EN FP: a cry for help
  de FP: ein Hilfeschrei
5272 | hiker (noun): a person who walks long distances in nature | loc: Wanderer
  EN TS: The hikers are going wild.
  de TS: Die Wanderer rasten total aus.
  EN FS: The hikers are going home.
  de FS: Die Wanderer gehen nach Hause.
  EN TP: hikers cheering at a canyon
  de TP: jubelnde Wanderer am Canyon
  EN FP: hikers resting in a tent
  de FP: Wanderer ruhen im Zelt
5273 | model (noun): a person who poses for a photographer | loc: Model
  EN TS: The model rocks green trousers.
  de TS: Das Model rockt die grüne Hose.
  EN FS: The model rocks orange trousers.
  de FS: Das Model rockt die orange Hose.
  EN TP: a model on the runway
  de TP: ein Model auf dem Laufsteg
  EN FP: a model of a plane
  de FP: ein Modellflugzeug
5274 | soaked (adjective): completely wet, right through | loc: durchnässt
  EN TS: Shower on. Now he is soaked.
  de TS: Dusche an. Jetzt ist er durchnässt.
  EN FS: Shower off. Now he is soaked.
  de FS: Dusche aus. Jetzt ist er durchnässt.
  EN TP: soaked in the shower
  de TP: durchnässt unter der Dusche
  EN FP: soaked in the rain
  de FP: durchnässt im Regen
5275 | selfish (adjective): only concerned with yourself, not with others | loc: egoistisch
  EN TS: Two selfish kids, one remote.
  de TS: Zwei egoistische Kids, eine Fernbedienung.
  EN FS: Two selfish kids, one phone.
  de FS: Zwei egoistische Kids, ein Handy.
  EN TP: selfish kids fighting
  de TP: egoistische Kinder streiten sich
  EN FP: a selfish driver parking
  de FP: ein egoistischer Fahrer beim Parken
5276 | sibling (noun): your brother or your sister | loc: Geschwisterteil | translator note: plural Geschwister used; Geschwisterteil has no natural plural
  EN TS: One cookie, two siblings: war.
  de TS: Ein Keks, zwei Geschwister: Krieg.
  EN FS: One cake, two siblings: war.
  de FS: Ein Kuchen, zwei Geschwister: Krieg.
  EN TP: siblings building a den
  de TP: Geschwister bauen eine Höhle
  EN FP: siblings doing homework
  de FP: Geschwister machen Hausaufgaben
5277 | agree (verb): to be in agreement with someone | loc: zustimmen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They agreed: half each.
  de TS: Sie haben zugestimmt: halbe-halbe.
  EN FS: They agreed: all for him.
  de FS: Sie haben zugestimmt: alles für ihn.
  EN TP: agreeing to share a cookie
  de TP: dem Teilen eines Kekses zustimmen
  EN FP: agreeing to share a room
  de FP: dem Teilen eines Zimmers zustimmen
5278 | corner (noun): the place where two streets meet | loc: Ecke
  EN TS: Corner reached. Moving on.
  de TS: Ecke erreicht. Weiter geht's.
  EN FS: River reached. Moving on.
  de FS: Fluss erreicht. Weiter geht's.
  EN TP: the corner of two streets
  de TP: die Ecke zweier Straßen
  EN FP: a corner of the room
  de FP: eine Ecke im Zimmer
5279 | scroll (noun): a long rolled sheet covered in handwriting | loc: Schriftrolle
  EN TS: He is signing a giant scroll with a giant pen!
  de TS: Er unterschreibt eine riesige Schriftrolle mit einem riesigen Stift!
  EN FS: He is signing a giant scroll with a tiny pen!
  de FS: Er unterschreibt eine riesige Schriftrolle mit einem winzigen Stift!
  EN TP: signing a giant scroll
  de TP: eine riesige Schriftrolle unterschreiben
  EN FP: reading an old scroll
  de FP: eine alte Schriftrolle lesen
5280 | signpost (noun): a post with arms that point the way | loc: Wegweiser
  EN TS: She is reading the signpost.
  de TS: Sie liest den Wegweiser.
  EN FS: She is painting the signpost.
  de FS: Sie streicht den Wegweiser an.
  EN TP: reading a wooden signpost
  de TP: einen hölzernen Wegweiser lesen
  EN FP: painting a wooden signpost
  de FP: einen hölzernen Wegweiser streichen
5281 | star (noun): someone who is very skilled and famous | loc: Star
  EN TS: The star is singing on stage.
  de TS: Der Star singt auf der Bühne.
  EN FS: The star is dancing on stage.
  de FS: Der Star tanzt auf der Bühne.
  EN TP: a star on stage
  de TP: ein Star auf der Bühne
  EN FP: a star in the sky
  de FP: ein Stern am Himmel
5282 | song (noun): a short piece of music with words | loc: Lied
  EN TS: Everyone is singing a song.
  de TS: Alle singen ein Lied.
  EN FS: Everyone is writing a song.
  de FS: Alle schreiben ein Lied.
  EN TP: singing a song
  de TP: ein Lied singen
  EN FP: a song on the radio
  de FP: ein Lied im Radio
5283 | tower (noun): anything shaped like a tall column | loc: Turm
  EN TS: It's just a small tower of plates.
  de TS: Nur ein kleiner Turm aus Tellern.
  EN FS: It's just a small tower of cups.
  de FS: Nur ein kleiner Turm aus Tassen.
  EN TP: a tower of plates
  de TP: ein Turm aus Tellern
  EN FP: a tower of glasses
  de FP: ein Turm aus Gläsern
5284 | metal (adjective): made of metal | loc: metallisch
  EN TS: Love the metal armour, knight.
  de TS: Schicke metallische Rüstung, Ritter.
  EN FS: Love the metal crown, knight.
  de FS: Schicke metallische Krone, Ritter.
  EN TP: a full metal suit
  de TP: eine komplette metallische Rüstung
  EN FP: a full metal band
  de FP: eine Metal-Band
5285 | happiness (noun): the feeling of joy and contentment | loc: Glück
  EN TS: Pure happiness in the garden.
  de TS: Pures Glück im Garten.
  EN FS: Pure happiness in the kitchen.
  de FS: Pures Glück in der Küche.
  EN TP: happiness in a sunny garden
  de TP: Glück in einem sonnigen Garten
  EN FP: happiness on a sunny beach
  de FP: Glück an einem sonnigen Strand
5286 | sweatshirt (noun): a warm soft long-sleeved top, often oversized | loc: Sweatshirt
  EN TS: They both want the sweatshirt!
  de TS: Beide wollen das Sweatshirt!
  EN FS: They both want the teddy bear!
  de FS: Beide wollen den Teddybären!
  EN TP: pulling a lilac sweatshirt
  de TP: an einem lila Sweatshirt ziehen
  EN FP: washing a lilac sweatshirt
  de FP: ein lila Sweatshirt waschen
5287 | silence (noun): when no one is speaking | loc: Stille
  EN TS: Fifteen girls, zero silence!
  de TS: Fünfzehn Mädchen, null Stille!
  EN FS: Fifteen boys, zero silence!
  de FS: Fünfzehn Jungs, null Stille!
  EN TP: a room without silence
  de TP: ein Raum ohne Stille
  EN FP: a minute of silence
  de FP: eine Minute Stille
5288 | ski (noun): narrow runners used in pairs to glide on snow | loc: Ski
  EN TS: He is flying down on his skis!
  de TS: Er fliegt auf seinen Skiern den Hang hinunter!
  EN FS: He is flying down on his sled!
  de FS: Er fliegt auf seinem Schlitten den Hang hinunter!
  EN TP: carving on skis
  de TP: Carven auf Skiern
  EN FP: skis leaning on a wall
  de FP: Skier an einer Wand
5289 | moisture (noun): wetness caused by water | loc: Feuchtigkeit
  EN TS: The skin lacks moisture.
  de TS: Der Haut fehlt Feuchtigkeit.
  EN FS: The skin lacks pores.
  de FS: Der Haut fehlen Poren.
  EN TP: skin without moisture
  de TP: Haut ohne Feuchtigkeit
  EN FP: moisture on a window
  de FP: Feuchtigkeit am Fenster
5290 | skyscraper (noun): a very tall building with many floors | loc: Wolkenkratzer
  EN TS: What a tall skyscraper!
  de TS: Was für ein hoher Wolkenkratzer!
  EN FS: What a tall lighthouse!
  de FS: Was für ein hoher Leuchtturm!
  EN TP: a spire-topped skyscraper
  de TP: ein Wolkenkratzer mit Spitze
  EN FP: a skyscraper being built
  de FP: ein Wolkenkratzer im Bau
5291 | businessman (noun): a man who works in business, often in a suit | loc: Geschäftsmann
  EN TS: Every businessman is sleeping.
  de TS: Jeder Geschäftsmann schläft.
  EN FS: Every businessman is reading.
  de FS: Jeder Geschäftsmann liest.
  EN TP: businessmen asleep on a plane
  de TP: schlafende Geschäftsmänner im Flugzeug
  EN FP: businessmen asleep on a train
  de FP: schlafende Geschäftsmänner im Zug
5292 | productive (adjective): producing a lot of work | loc: produktiv
  EN TS: Nobody here is very productive.
  de TS: Niemand hier ist besonders produktiv.
  EN FS: Everybody here is very productive.
  de FS: Alle hier sind sehr produktiv.
  EN TP: not a productive day
  de TP: kein produktiver Tag
  EN FP: a productive team meeting
  de FP: ein produktives Teammeeting
5293 | glove (noun): the handwear used to catch a baseball | loc: Handschuh
  EN TS: The ball is in his glove now.
  de TS: Der Ball ist jetzt in seinem Handschuh.
  EN FS: The ball is in his cap now.
  de FS: Der Ball ist jetzt in seiner Kappe.
  EN TP: a leather baseball glove
  de TP: ein Baseballhandschuh aus Leder
  EN FP: a glove for the winter
  de FP: ein Handschuh für den Winter
5294 | slippers (noun): soft warm shoes worn inside the house | loc: Hausschuhe
  EN TS: Her feet love the slippers.
  de TS: Ihre Füße lieben die Hausschuhe.
  EN FS: Her feet love the socks.
  de FS: Ihre Füße lieben die Socken.
  EN TP: fluffy sheep slippers
  de TP: flauschige Schaf-Hausschuhe
  EN FP: slippers under the bed
  de FP: Hausschuhe unter dem Bett
5295 | horn (noun): a thing you blow to make a loud noise | loc: Horn
  EN TS: He is blowing a huge horn.
  de TS: Er bläst ein riesiges Horn.
  EN FS: He is blowing a tiny horn.
  de FS: Er bläst ein winziges Horn.
  EN TP: blowing a long horn
  de TP: ein langes Horn blasen
  EN FP: a horn on a sheep
  de FP: ein Horn an einem Schaf
5296 | traditional (adjective): done or worn as it was long ago | loc: traditionell
  EN TS: He is making traditional food!
  de TS: Er kocht traditionelles Essen!
  EN FS: He is buying traditional food!
  de FS: Er kauft traditionelles Essen!
  EN TP: cooking traditional food
  de TP: traditionelles Essen kochen
  EN FP: a traditional dance
  de FP: ein traditioneller Tanz
5297 | ruin (noun): a state of total destruction | loc: Verfall
  EN TS: The old castle lies in ruins.
  de TS: Die alte Burg ist dem Verfall preisgegeben.
  EN FS: The old bridge lies in ruins.
  de FS: Die alte Brücke ist dem Verfall preisgegeben.
  EN TP: a castle in ruins
  de TP: eine Burg im Verfall
  EN FP: a castle in the snow
  de FP: eine Burg im Schnee
5298 | blazer (noun): a smart formal jacket worn over a shirt | loc: Blazer
  EN TS: Her blazer is beige.
  de TS: Ihr Blazer ist beige.
  EN FS: Her blazer is black.
  de FS: Ihr Blazer ist schwarz.
  EN TP: a beige tailored blazer
  de TP: ein taillierter beiger Blazer
  EN FP: trying on a blazer
  de FP: einen Blazer anprobieren
5299 | illegal (adjective): not allowed by law or the rules | loc: illegal
  EN TS: Her sausages are illegal here!
  de TS: Ihre Würstchen sind hier illegal!
  EN FS: Her books are illegal here!
  de FS: Ihre Bücher sind hier illegal!
  EN TP: illegal food in a suitcase
  de TP: illegales Essen im Koffer
  EN FP: illegal parking at the airport
  de FP: illegales Parken am Flughafen
5300 | threat (noun): something that is a source of danger | loc: Bedrohung
  EN TS: The viper is a real threat.
  de TS: Die Viper ist eine echte Bedrohung.
  EN FS: The lizard is a real threat.
  de FS: Die Eidechse ist eine echte Bedrohung.
  EN TP: a threat on the rocks
  de TP: eine Bedrohung auf den Felsen
  EN FP: a threat in a letter
  de FP: eine Bedrohung in einem Brief
5301 | allergy (noun): a bad body reaction to pollen or dust | loc: Allergie
  EN TS: Her allergy hates this meadow.
  de TS: Ihre Allergie hasst diese Wiese.
  EN FS: Her allergy hates this beach.
  de FS: Ihre Allergie hasst diesen Strand.
  EN TP: an allergy to pollen
  de TP: eine Allergie gegen Pollen
  EN FP: an allergy to dogs
  de FP: eine Allergie gegen Hunde
5302 | blossom (noun): a flower on a tree, like cherry blossom | loc: Blüte
  EN TS: The blossoms made him sneeze!
  de TS: Die Blüten haben ihn zum Niesen gebracht!
  EN FS: The blossoms made him cry!
  de FS: Die Blüten haben ihn zum Weinen gebracht!
  EN TP: sneezing under blossoms
  de TP: Niesen unter Blüten
  EN FP: painting cherry blossoms
  de FP: Kirschblüten malen
5303 | snowflake (noun): a single small ice crystal that falls as snow | loc: Schneeflocke
  EN TS: Snowflakes on her mitten.
  de TS: Schneeflocken auf ihrem Fäustling.
  EN FS: Snowflakes on her shoe.
  de FS: Schneeflocken auf ihrem Schuh.
  EN TP: a snowflake on a mitten
  de TP: eine Schneeflocke auf einem Fäustling
  EN FP: a snowflake on a window
  de FP: eine Schneeflocke am Fenster
5304 | dirt (noun): mud, dust or grime that makes something unclean | loc: Schmutz
  EN TS: Ew! Dirt all over her hands!
  de TS: Iiih! Schmutz überall an ihren Händen!
  EN FS: Ew! Paint all over her hands!
  de FS: Iiih! Farbe überall an ihren Händen!
  EN TP: dirt on her hands
  de TP: Schmutz an ihren Händen
  EN FP: dirt on her shoes
  de FP: Schmutz an ihren Schuhen
5305 | society (noun): a large social group with its own culture | loc: Gesellschaft
  EN TS: Their society is hard at work.
  de TS: Ihre Gesellschaft arbeitet hart.
  EN FS: Their society is on holiday.
  de FS: Ihre Gesellschaft ist im Urlaub.
  EN TP: a whole society at work
  de TP: eine ganze Gesellschaft bei der Arbeit
  EN FP: a society at a party
  de FP: eine Gesellschaft auf einer Party
5306 | comfortable (adjective): giving a feeling of physical well-being | loc: bequem
  EN TS: So comfortable on one sofa!
  de TS: So bequem auf einem Sofa!
  EN FS: So comfortable on one bed!
  de FS: So bequem in einem Bett!
  EN TP: comfortable on a full sofa
  de TP: bequem auf einem vollen Sofa
  EN FP: comfortable in a big bed
  de FP: bequem in einem großen Bett
5307 | spacious (adjective): having a lot of open room inside | loc: geräumig
  EN TS: The room is very spacious.
  de TS: Das Zimmer ist sehr geräumig.
  EN FS: The room is very small.
  de FS: Das Zimmer ist sehr klein.
  EN TP: a spacious living room
  de TP: ein geräumiges Wohnzimmer
  EN FP: a spacious car boot
  de FP: ein geräumiger Kofferraum
5308 | sunflower (noun): a very tall flower with a big round yellow head | loc: Sonnenblume
  EN TS: A man brings her sunflowers.
  de TS: Ein Mann bringt ihr Sonnenblumen.
  EN FS: A man brings her roses.
  de FS: Ein Mann bringt ihr Rosen.
  EN TP: a bunch of sunflowers
  de TP: ein Strauß Sonnenblumen
  EN FP: a field of sunflowers
  de FP: ein Feld voller Sonnenblumen
5309 | note (noun): a short written record | loc: Notiz
  EN TS: Someone left her a sweet note.
  de TS: Jemand hat ihr eine süße Notiz hinterlassen.
  EN FS: Someone left her a sad note.
  de FS: Jemand hat ihr eine traurige Notiz hinterlassen.
  EN TP: a note with a smiley
  de TP: eine Notiz mit Smiley
  EN FP: a note on the fridge
  de FP: eine Notiz am Kühlschrank
5310 | son (noun): a male child of his parents | loc: Sohn
  EN TS: A son is helping fix the car.
  de TS: Ein Sohn hilft, das Auto zu reparieren.
  EN FS: A son is helping wash the car.
  de FS: Ein Sohn hilft, das Auto zu waschen.
  EN TP: a son holding a spanner
  de TP: ein Sohn mit einem Schraubenschlüssel
  EN FP: a son washing the car
  de FP: ein Sohn wäscht das Auto
5311 | calm (adjective): quiet, relaxed and not worried at all | loc: ruhig
  EN TS: Now the whole group is calm.
  de TS: Jetzt ist die ganze Gruppe ruhig.
  EN FS: Now the whole group is angry.
  de FS: Jetzt ist die ganze Gruppe wütend.
  EN TP: calm under blankets
  de TP: ruhig unter Decken
  EN FP: calm under pressure
  de FP: ruhig unter Druck
5312 | backyard (noun): the private grassy area behind a house | loc: Hinterhof
  EN TS: Backyard barbecue? Let's go!
  de TS: Grillen im Hinterhof? Los geht's!
  EN FS: Backyard pool party? Let's go!
  de FS: Poolparty im Hinterhof? Los geht's!
  EN TP: a barbecue in the backyard
  de TP: Grillen im Hinterhof
  EN FP: a pool in the backyard
  de FP: ein Pool im Hinterhof
5313 | neon (adjective): glowing in bright electric colours | loc: neonfarben
  EN TS: Neon signs cover every wall.
  de TS: Neonfarbene Schilder bedecken jede Wand.
  EN FS: Paper signs cover every wall.
  de FS: Papierschilder bedecken jede Wand.
  EN TP: glowing neon signs
  de TP: leuchtende neonfarbene Schilder
  EN FP: neon lights in a club
  de FP: neonfarbene Lichter in einem Club
5314 | basket (noun): a woven container with handles | loc: Korb
  EN TS: Her basket holds all of Paris!
  de TS: In ihrem Korb steckt ganz Paris!
  EN FS: Her bag holds all of Paris!
  de FS: In ihrer Tasche steckt ganz Paris!
  EN TP: a basket of souvenirs
  de TP: ein Korb voller Souvenirs
  EN FP: a basket of fruit
  de FP: ein Korb voller Obst
5315 | postcard (noun): a card with a picture you write on and send | loc: Postkarte
  EN TS: She has a lot of postcards. For whom?
  de TS: Sie hat jede Menge Postkarten. Für wen wohl?
  EN FS: She has a lot of stamps. For whom?
  de FS: Sie hat jede Menge Briefmarken. Für wen wohl?
  EN TP: postcards of Paris
  de TP: Postkarten von Paris
  EN FP: writing a postcard
  de FP: eine Postkarte schreiben
5316 | curly (adjective): growing in curls instead of straight | loc: lockig
  EN TS: Love her bouncy curly hair.
  de TS: Ich liebe ihr wippendes, lockiges Haar.
  EN FS: Love her bouncy straight hair.
  de FS: Ich liebe ihr wippendes, glattes Haar.
  EN TP: tight curly dark hair
  de TP: dunkles, eng lockiges Haar
  EN FP: long curly blonde hair
  de FP: langes, lockiges blondes Haar
5317 | ruffle (noun): a strip of frilly fabric used as trim | loc: Rüsche
  EN TS: Her ruffles are flying!
  de TS: Ihre Rüschen fliegen!
  EN FS: Her shoes are flying!
  de FS: Ihre Schuhe fliegen!
  EN TP: layers of red ruffles
  de TP: Lagen roter Rüschen
  EN FP: ruffles on a shirt collar
  de FP: Rüschen an einem Hemdkragen
5318 | speak (verb): to express something in speech | loc: sprechen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is speaking to the public.
  de TS: Sie spricht vor Publikum.
  EN FS: She is singing to the public.
  de FS: Sie singt vor Publikum.
  EN TP: speaking into a microphone
  de TP: ins Mikrofon sprechen
  EN FP: speaking on the phone
  de FP: am Telefon sprechen
5319 | web (noun): a network formed by weaving threads | loc: Spinnennetz
  EN TS: The spider is below its web.
  de TS: Die Spinne sitzt unter ihrem Spinnennetz.
  EN FS: The spider is above its web.
  de FS: Die Spinne sitzt über ihrem Spinnennetz.
  EN TP: a web between branches
  de TP: ein Spinnennetz zwischen Ästen
  EN FP: a web in a corner
  de FP: ein Spinnennetz in einer Ecke
5320 | demonstrate (verb): to show something to an audience | loc: vorführen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is demonstrating a spine.
  de TS: Sie führt eine Wirbelsäule vor.
  EN FS: She is demonstrating a heart.
  de FS: Sie führt ein Herz vor.
  EN TP: demonstrating on a spine model
  de TP: etwas am Wirbelsäulenmodell vorführen
  EN FP: demonstrating in the street
  de FP: auf der Straße demonstrieren
5321 | skate (verb): to glide over ice wearing ice skates | loc: Schlittschuh laufen
  EN TS: He is skating like a pro.
  de TS: Er läuft Schlittschuh wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: He is skiing like a pro.
  de FS: Er fährt Ski wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: skating on one leg
  de TP: auf einem Bein Schlittschuh laufen
  EN FP: skating on a road
  de FP: auf der Straße Schlittschuh laufen
5322 | spit (verb): to force water or saliva out of your mouth | loc: spucken
  EN TS: Bad soup! He spat it out.
  de TS: Eklige Suppe! Er hat sie ausgespuckt.
  EN FS: Bad tea! He spat it out.
  de FS: Ekliger Tee! Er hat ihn ausgespuckt.
  EN TP: spitting out green soup
  de TP: grüne Suppe ausspucken
  EN FP: spitting out a cherry stone
  de FP: einen Kirschkern ausspucken
5323 | stone (noun): a lump or mass of hard rock | loc: Stein
  EN TS: That stone made a big splash.
  de TS: Dieser Stein hat einen Mega-Platscher gemacht.
  EN FS: That boat made a big splash.
  de FS: Dieses Boot hat einen Mega-Platscher gemacht.
  EN TP: throwing a big stone
  de TP: einen großen Stein werfen
  EN FP: skimming a flat stone
  de FP: einen flachen Stein hüpfen lassen
5324 | sponge (noun): a soft object with holes used for washing | loc: Schwamm
  EN TS: The sponge beat the sauce!
  de TS: Der Schwamm hat die Soße besiegt!
  EN FS: The sponge beat the cheese!
  de FS: Der Schwamm hat den Käse besiegt!
  EN TP: a soapy sponge
  de TP: ein seifiger Schwamm
  EN FP: a sponge cake
  de FP: ein Biskuitkuchen
5325 | spouse (noun): a person's partner in marriage | loc: Ehepartner
  EN TS: The spouses signed a document.
  de TS: Die Ehepartner haben ein Dokument unterschrieben.
  EN FS: The spouses burned a document.
  de FS: Die Ehepartner haben ein Dokument verbrannt.
  EN TP: spouses signing papers
  de TP: Ehepartner unterschreiben Papiere
  EN FP: spouses arguing at home
  de FP: Ehepartner streiten zu Hause
5326 | coach (noun): someone in charge of training an athlete or team | loc: Trainer
  EN TS: The coach is taping her ankle.
  de TS: Der Trainer tapt ihr den Knöchel.
  EN FS: The coach is taping her wrist.
  de FS: Der Trainer tapt ihr das Handgelenk.
  EN TP: a coach helping a gymnast
  de TP: ein Trainer hilft einer Turnerin
  EN FP: a coach shouting at players
  de FP: ein Trainer brüllt Spieler an
5327 | cape (noun): a loose sleeveless coat hanging from the shoulders | loc: Umhang
  EN TS: The client wears a black cape.
  de TS: Die Kundin trägt einen schwarzen Umhang.
  EN FS: The client wears a white cape.
  de FS: Die Kundin trägt einen weißen Umhang.
  EN TP: a black salon cape
  de TP: ein schwarzer Friseurumhang
  EN FP: a superhero cape
  de FP: ein Superheldenumhang
5328 | blouse (noun): a loose light shirt worn by women | loc: Bluse
  EN TS: She is sniffing a peach blouse.
  de TS: Sie schnuppert an einer pfirsichfarbenen Bluse.
  EN FS: She is sniffing a white blouse.
  de FS: Sie schnuppert an einer weißen Bluse.
  EN TP: a peach ruffled blouse
  de TP: eine pfirsichfarbene Rüschenbluse
  EN FP: ironing a peach blouse
  de FP: eine pfirsichfarbene Bluse bügeln
5329 | seed (noun): the small hard part that grows into a plant | loc: Samen
  EN TS: The seed has a tiny root!
  de TS: Der Samen hat eine winzige Wurzel!
  EN FS: The seed has a tiny flower!
  de FS: Der Samen hat eine winzige Blüte!
  EN TP: a seed with a root
  de TP: ein Samen mit Wurzel
  EN FP: a seed in a beak
  de FP: ein Samen im Schnabel
5330 | spy (noun): a person who secretly finds out information | loc: Spion
  EN TS: The "secret" spy has a hole in his newspaper.
  de TS: Der „geheime“ Spion hat ein Loch in seiner Zeitung.
  EN FS: The "secret" spy has a hole in his hat.
  de FS: Der „geheime“ Spion hat ein Loch in seinem Hut.
  EN TP: a spy behind a newspaper
  de TP: ein Spion hinter einer Zeitung
  EN FP: a spy behind a door
  de FP: ein Spion hinter einer Tür
5331 | fitness (noun): good physical condition | loc: Fitness
  EN TS: Her fitness? She crushes watermelons!
  de TS: Ihre Fitness? Sie zerdrückt Wassermelonen!
  EN FS: Her fitness? She crushes coconuts!
  de FS: Ihre Fitness? Sie zerdrückt Kokosnüsse!
  EN TP: fitness at a beach bar
  de TP: Fitness an einer Strandbar
  EN FP: a fitness app
  de FP: eine Fitness-App
5332 | unity (noun): being one undivided whole | loc: Einheit
  EN TS: The staff shows strong unity.
  de TS: Das Personal tritt als starke Einheit auf.
  EN FS: The guests show strong unity.
  de FS: Die Gäste treten als starke Einheit auf.
  EN TP: the unity of the team
  de TP: die Einheit des Teams
  EN FP: the unity of the country
  de FP: die Einheit des Landes
5333 | staircase (noun): a set of stairs inside a building | loc: Treppenhaus
  EN TS: Each staircase is fancier!
  de TS: Jedes Treppenhaus ist noch edler!
  EN FS: Each staircase is dirtier!
  de FS: Jedes Treppenhaus ist noch dreckiger!
  EN TP: a grand marble staircase
  de TP: ein prächtiges Treppenhaus aus Marmor
  EN FP: a staircase in a lighthouse
  de FP: ein Treppenhaus im Leuchtturm
5334 | respect (verb): to show respect towards someone | loc: respektieren
  EN TS: The fans respect this moment.
  de TS: Die Fans respektieren diesen Moment.
  EN FS: The fans ignore this moment.
  de FS: Die Fans ignorieren diesen Moment.
  EN TP: respecting the moment
  de TP: den Moment respektieren
  EN FP: respecting the speed limit
  de FP: das Tempolimit respektieren
5335 | enthusiastic (adjective): showing great excitement and interest | loc: begeistert
  EN TS: She is an enthusiastic fan.
  de TS: Sie ist ein begeisterter Fan.
  EN FS: She is an enthusiastic player.
  de FS: Sie ist eine begeisterte Spielerin.
  EN TP: an enthusiastic football fan
  de TP: ein begeisterter Fußballfan
  EN FP: an enthusiastic tennis fan
  de FP: ein begeisterter Tennisfan
5336 | loyalty (noun): the quality of being loyal | loc: Treue
  EN TS: His cap shows his loyalty.
  de TS: Seine Kappe zeigt seine Treue.
  EN FS: His scarf shows his loyalty.
  de FS: Sein Schal zeigt seine Treue.
  EN TP: loyalty to the club
  de TP: Treue zum Verein
  EN FP: loyalty to the king
  de FP: Treue zum König
5337 | rail (noun): the railway, the train system | loc: Bahn
  EN TS: Croissant in mouth, he is travelling by rail.
  de TS: Croissant im Mund, er fährt mit der Bahn.
  EN FS: Pizza in mouth, he is travelling by rail.
  de FS: Pizza im Mund, er fährt mit der Bahn.
  EN TP: travelling by rail
  de TP: mit der Bahn reisen
  EN FP: travelling by air
  de FP: mit dem Flugzeug reisen
5338 | stay (verb): to stay put in one certain place | loc: bleiben
  EN TS: You can stay for 10 euros or for 10,000 euros.
  de TS: Du kannst für 10 Euro bleiben oder für 10.000 Euro.
  EN FS: You can stay for 10 euros or for 1,000 euros.
  de FS: Du kannst für 10 Euro bleiben oder für 1.000 Euro.
  EN TP: staying in a hostel
  de TP: im Hostel bleiben
  EN FP: staying at home
  de FP: zu Hause bleiben
5339 | control (verb): to handle a machine and make it function | loc: steuern
  EN TS: She is controlling a bus.
  de TS: Sie steuert einen Bus.
  EN FS: She is controlling a tram.
  de FS: Sie steuert eine Straßenbahn.
  EN TP: controlling a city bus
  de TP: einen Stadtbus steuern
  EN FP: controlling a drone
  de FP: eine Drohne steuern
5340 | garage (noun): a building where a car is kept | loc: Garage
  EN TS: A box is going to the garage.
  de TS: Ein Karton kommt in die Garage.
  EN FS: A box is going to the car.
  de FS: Ein Karton kommt ins Auto.
  EN TP: an open garage
  de TP: eine offene Garage
  EN FP: a garage full of cars
  de FP: eine Garage voller Autos
5341 | nail (verb): to attach something with nails | loc: nageln
  EN TS: The boy is nailing a plank.
  de TS: Der Junge nagelt ein Brett fest.
  EN FS: The boy is painting a plank.
  de FS: Der Junge streicht ein Brett an.
  EN TP: nailing a plank
  de TP: ein Brett nageln
  EN FP: nailing a poster
  de FP: ein Poster annageln
5342 | tongue (noun): the soft muscular part inside your mouth | loc: Zunge
  EN TS: Frosting on her tongue. Yum!
  de TS: Zuckerguss auf ihrer Zunge. Yummy!
  EN FS: Ketchup on her tongue. Yum!
  de FS: Ketchup auf ihrer Zunge. Yummy!
  EN TP: frosting on her tongue
  de TP: Zuckerguss auf ihrer Zunge
  EN FP: burning her tongue on tea
  de FP: sich am Tee die Zunge verbrennen
5343 | twin (adjective): being two identical ones that match | loc: gleich
  EN TS: The girls have twin beds.
  de TS: Die Mädchen haben zwei gleiche Betten.
  EN FS: The girls have bunk beds.
  de FS: Die Mädchen haben ein Etagenbett.
  EN TP: two matching twin beds
  de TP: zwei gleiche Einzelbetten
  EN FP: a hotel twin room
  de FP: ein Hotel-Zweibettzimmer
5344 | quilt (noun): a warm cover sewn from many pieces of cloth | loc: Steppdecke
  EN TS: They made a big quilt!
  de TS: Sie haben eine große Steppdecke genäht!
  EN FS: They made a big flag!
  de FS: Sie haben eine große Flagge genäht!
  EN TP: a finished patchwork quilt
  de TP: eine fertige Patchwork-Steppdecke
  EN FP: a quilt on a bed
  de FP: eine Steppdecke auf dem Bett
5345 | lean (verb): to rest your body sideways on something | loc: lehnen
  EN TS: She is leaning on the railing.
  de TS: Sie lehnt am Geländer.
  EN FS: She is leaning on a tree.
  de FS: Sie lehnt an einem Baum.
  EN TP: leaning on a bridge railing
  de TP: am Brückengeländer lehnen
  EN FP: leaning on a garden fence
  de FP: am Gartenzaun lehnen
5346 | stomach (noun): the muscular organ that holds the food you eat | loc: Magen
  EN TS: He is patting his stomach.
  de TS: Er klopft sich auf den Magen.
  EN FS: He is patting his head.
  de FS: Er klopft sich auf den Kopf.
  EN TP: a full stomach
  de TP: ein voller Magen
  EN FP: a stomach full of soup
  de FP: ein Magen voller Suppe
5347 | stop (noun): the act of stopping something | loc: Halt
  EN TS: Traffic is coming to a stop.
  de TS: Der Verkehr kommt zum Halt.
  EN FS: Trains are coming to a stop.
  de FS: Die Züge kommen zum Halt.
  EN TP: a stop for the traffic
  de TP: ein Halt für den Verkehr
  EN FP: a stop for a coffee
  de FP: ein Halt für einen Kaffee
5348 | thank (verb): to express gratitude to someone | loc: danken
  EN TS: She is thanking the man with the umbrella.
  de TS: Sie dankt dem Mann mit dem Regenschirm.
  EN FS: She is thanking the man with the dog.
  de FS: Sie dankt dem Mann mit dem Hund.
  EN TP: to thank a kind stranger
  de TP: einem netten Fremden danken
  EN FP: to thank the bus driver
  de FP: dem Busfahrer danken
5349 | award (verb): to give something as an honor or reward | loc: verleihen
  EN TS: She is awarding yet another medal!
  de TS: Sie verleiht schon wieder eine Medaille!
  EN FS: She is awarding yet another trophy!
  de FS: Sie verleiht schon wieder einen Pokal!
  EN TP: awarding a medal
  de TP: eine Medaille verleihen
  EN FP: awarding a song prize
  de FP: einen Musikpreis verleihen
5350 | creek (noun): a small natural stream of water | loc: Bach
  EN TS: Mid-air over the creek. Brave!
  de TS: Mitten in der Luft über dem Bach. Mutig!
  EN FS: Mid-air over the lake. Brave!
  de FS: Mitten in der Luft über dem See. Mutig!
  EN TP: jumping across a creek
  de TP: über einen Bach springen
  EN FP: swimming in a creek
  de FP: in einem Bach schwimmen
5351 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: Straßenlaterne
  EN TS: Orange streetlights, so cozy.
  de TS: Orange Straßenlaternen, so gemütlich.
  EN FS: Blue streetlights, so cozy.
  de FS: Blaue Straßenlaternen, so gemütlich.
  EN TP: a row of streetlights
  de TP: eine Reihe Straßenlaternen
  EN FP: a broken streetlight
  de FP: eine kaputte Straßenlaterne
5352 | frustration (noun): the feeling of being blocked from your goals | loc: Frustration
  EN TS: Her frustration is at 1000 %.
  de TS: Ihre Frustration liegt bei 1000 %.
  EN FS: Her frustration is at 0 %.
  de FS: Ihre Frustration liegt bei 0 %.
  EN TP: frustration at a laptop
  de TP: Frustration am Laptop
  EN FP: frustration at a teacher
  de FP: Frustration über einen Lehrer
5353 | paperwork (noun): work that means handling forms and papers | loc: Papierkram
  EN TS: The paperwork is winning.
  de TS: Der Papierkram gewinnt.
  EN FS: The paperwork is shrinking.
  de FS: Der Papierkram schrumpft.
  EN TP: towers of paperwork
  de TP: Türme aus Papierkram
  EN FP: paperwork on a laptop
  de FP: Papierkram am Laptop
5354 | class (noun): teaching given as a series of lessons | loc: Klasse
  EN TS: The class follows her well.
  de TS: Die Klasse folgt ihr gut.
  EN FS: The class follows him well.
  de FS: Die Klasse folgt ihm gut.
  EN TP: a class in the park
  de TP: eine Klasse im Park
  EN FP: a class in a school
  de FP: eine Klasse in einer Schule
5355 | trainer (noun): someone who trains other people or animals | loc: Trainer
  EN TS: Even the cat copies the trainer!
  de TS: Sogar die Katze macht den Trainer nach!
  EN FS: Even the dog copies the trainer!
  de FS: Sogar der Hund macht den Trainer nach!
  EN TP: a trainer in the park
  de TP: ein Trainer im Park
  EN FP: a dog trainer with treats
  de FP: ein Hundetrainer mit Leckerlis
5356 | yoga (noun): calm stretching poses with slow breathing | loc: das Yoga
  EN TS: Rooftop yoga at sunset: goals.
  de TS: Yoga auf dem Dach bei Sonnenuntergang: Goals.
  EN FS: Beach yoga at sunset: goals.
  de FS: Yoga am Strand bei Sonnenuntergang: Goals.
  EN TP: yoga on a rooftop
  de TP: Yoga auf einem Dach
  EN FP: yoga in a gym class
  de FP: Yoga im Fitnesskurs
5357 | fancy (adjective): decorated, expensive-looking and not plain | loc: vornehm
  EN TS: The dog has a fancier stroller than most babies.
  de TS: Der Hund hat einen vornehmeren Kinderwagen als die meisten Babys.
  EN FS: The cat has a fancier stroller than most babies.
  de FS: Die Katze hat einen vornehmeren Kinderwagen als die meisten Babys.
  EN TP: a fancy chrome stroller
  de TP: ein vornehmer Chrom-Kinderwagen
  EN FP: a fancy dress party
  de FP: eine Kostümparty
5358 | peek (verb): to take a quick secret look from hiding | loc: spähen
  EN TS: She is peeking through books.
  de TS: Sie späht zwischen Büchern hindurch.
  EN FS: She is peeking through blinds.
  de FS: Sie späht durch die Jalousien.
  EN TP: peeking through a gap
  de TP: durch eine Lücke spähen
  EN FP: peeking inside a book
  de FP: in ein Buch spähen
5359 | hippo (noun): a very big grey animal that lives in rivers | loc: Nilpferd
  EN TS: The hippo is hiding from her.
  de TS: Das Nilpferd versteckt sich vor ihr.
  EN FS: The duck is hiding from her.
  de FS: Die Ente versteckt sich vor ihr.
  EN TP: a hippo in the river
  de TP: ein Nilpferd im Fluss
  EN FP: a hippo on the jetty
  de FP: ein Nilpferd auf dem Steg
5360 | metro (noun): an electric railway that runs below the ground | loc: U-Bahn
  EN TS: The metro is "a bit" busy.
  de TS: Die U-Bahn ist „ein bisschen“ voll.
  EN FS: The metro is "a bit" empty.
  de FS: Die U-Bahn ist „ein bisschen“ leer.
  EN TP: a packed metro station
  de TP: eine überfüllte U-Bahn-Station
  EN FP: an empty metro station
  de FP: eine leere U-Bahn-Station
5361 | easy (adjective): needing little effort, not difficult | loc: einfach
  EN TS: Six bags are "easy" to push.
  de TS: Sechs Taschen sind „einfach“ zu schieben.
  EN FS: Six boxes are "easy" to push.
  de FS: Sechs Kisten sind „einfach“ zu schieben.
  EN TP: not an easy trip
  de TP: keine einfache Reise
  EN FP: not an easy exam
  de FP: keine einfache Prüfung
5362 | silly (adjective): foolish in a funny, ludicrous way | loc: albern
  EN TS: The silliest glasses on the island!
  de TS: Die albernste Brille der Insel!
  EN FS: The silliest hat on the island!
  de FS: Der albernste Hut der Insel!
  EN TP: silly heart sunglasses
  de TP: alberne Herz-Sonnenbrille
  EN FP: silly heart balloons
  de FP: alberne Herzluftballons
5363 | aid (verb): to give help to someone | loc: helfen
  EN TS: They are aiding the runner.
  de TS: Sie helfen dem Läufer.
  EN FS: They are aiding the cyclist.
  de FS: Sie helfen dem Radfahrer.
  EN TP: aiding an exhausted runner
  de TP: einem erschöpften Läufer helfen
  EN FP: aiding a lost tourist
  de FP: einem verirrten Touristen helfen
5364 | assist (verb): to give someone help with something | loc: unterstützen
  EN TS: Two heroes are assisting her!
  de TS: Zwei Helden unterstützen sie!
  EN FS: Two nurses are assisting her!
  de FS: Zwei Krankenschwestern unterstützen sie!
  EN TP: assisting a tired runner
  de TP: eine müde Läuferin unterstützen
  EN FP: assisting a tired driver
  de FP: einen müden Fahrer unterstützen
5365 | weapon (noun): an instrument used in fighting or hunting | loc: Waffe
  EN TS: He is lowering his weapon.
  de TS: Er senkt seine Waffe.
  EN FS: He is cleaning his weapon.
  de FS: Er reinigt seine Waffe.
  EN TP: lowering a paintball weapon
  de TP: eine Paintball-Waffe senken
  EN FP: loading a paintball weapon
  de FP: eine Paintball-Waffe laden
5366 | surrender (verb): to give up to the power of another | loc: sich ergeben | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is surrendering!
  de TS: Er ergibt sich!
  EN FS: He is attacking!
  de FS: Er greift an!
  EN TP: surrendering with raised hands
  de TP: sich mit erhobenen Händen ergeben
  EN FP: surrendering his passport
  de FP: seinen Reisepass abgeben
5367 | stuff (verb): to cram something into a tight space | loc: stopfen
  EN TS: She is stuffing her mouth!
  de TS: Sie stopft sich den Mund voll!
  EN FS: She is stuffing her bag!
  de FS: Sie stopft ihre Tasche voll!
  EN TP: stuffing in a cheeseburger
  de TP: einen Cheeseburger reinstopfen
  EN FP: stuffing a turkey
  de FP: einen Truthahn stopfen
5368 | suffer (verb): to be subjected to something bad | loc: leiden
  EN TS: The heat makes them suffer.
  de TS: Die Hitze lässt sie leiden.
  EN FS: The cold makes them suffer.
  de FS: Die Kälte lässt sie leiden.
  EN TP: suffering in the heat
  de TP: in der Hitze leiden
  EN FP: suffering from a cold
  de FP: an einer Erkältung leiden
5369 | tough (adjective): not given to gentleness or soft feelings | loc: hart
  EN TS: Tough boxer, soaked in sweat.
  de TS: Harter Boxer, schweißgebadet.
  EN FS: Tough boxer, soaked in rain.
  de FS: Harter Boxer, vom Regen durchnässt.
  EN TP: a tough young boxer
  de TP: ein harter junger Boxer
  EN FP: a tough piece of meat
  de FP: ein hartes Stück Fleisch
5370 | canoe (noun): a narrow boat you move with a paddle | loc: Kanu
  EN TS: He is paddling a yellow canoe.
  de TS: Er paddelt ein gelbes Kanu.
  EN FS: He is paddling a red canoe.
  de FS: Er paddelt ein rotes Kanu.
  EN TP: paddling a yellow canoe
  de TP: ein gelbes Kanu paddeln
  EN FP: carrying a canoe home
  de FP: ein Kanu nach Hause tragen
5371 | garland (noun): a chain of flowers worn or hung as decoration | loc: Girlande
  EN TS: They look cool in flower garlands.
  de TS: Mit Blumengirlanden sehen sie cool aus.
  EN FS: They look cool in paper crowns.
  de FS: Mit Papierkronen sehen sie cool aus.
  EN TP: wearing flower garlands
  de TP: Blumengirlanden tragen
  EN FP: hanging a garland indoors
  de FP: drinnen eine Girlande aufhängen
5372 | broom (noun): a brush with a long handle for sweeping floors | loc: Besen
  EN TS: His broom is pushing leaves.
  de TS: Sein Besen schiebt Laub.
  EN FS: His broom is pushing snow.
  de FS: Sein Besen schiebt Schnee.
  EN TP: a broom and dry leaves
  de TP: ein Besen und trockenes Laub
  EN FP: a broom in the kitchen
  de FP: ein Besen in der Küche
5373 | expand (verb): to become larger in size or volume | loc: sich ausdehnen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everything is expanding!
  de TS: Alles dehnt sich aus!
  EN FS: Everything is shrinking!
  de FS: Alles schrumpft!
  EN TP: a bouncy castle expanding
  de TP: eine Hüpfburg dehnt sich aus
  EN FP: a business expanding abroad
  de FP: eine Firma expandiert ins Ausland
5374 | shallow (adjective): not deep, lacking much depth | loc: flach
  EN TS: The water is a bit shallow.
  de TS: Das Wasser ist ein bisschen flach.
  EN FS: The water is a bit deep.
  de FS: Das Wasser ist ein bisschen tief.
  EN TP: swimming in shallow water
  de TP: im flachen Wasser schwimmen
  EN FP: a shallow soup bowl
  de FP: ein flacher Suppenteller
5375 | swing (verb): to move something in a curve or arc to hit | loc: schwingen
  EN TS: She is swinging like a pro.
  de TS: Sie schwingt wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: She is swimming like a pro.
  de FS: Sie schwimmt wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: swinging a golf club
  de TP: einen Golfschläger schwingen
  EN FP: swinging a baseball bat
  de FP: einen Baseballschläger schwingen
5376 | switch (noun): a device that turns the electricity on or off | loc: Lichtschalter
  EN TS: He pressed the switch. Light!
  de TS: Er hat den Lichtschalter gedrückt. Licht!
  EN FS: He kicked the switch. Light!
  de FS: Er hat gegen den Lichtschalter getreten. Licht!
  EN TP: pressing a light switch
  de TP: einen Lichtschalter drücken
  EN FP: a switch on a railway
  de FP: eine Weiche an der Bahnstrecke
5377 | collect (verb): to gather things together into one place | loc: sammeln
  EN TS: She collected the plates.
  de TS: Sie hat die Teller eingesammelt.
  EN FS: She collected the apples.
  de FS: Sie hat die Äpfel eingesammelt.
  EN TP: collected dirty plates
  de TP: eingesammelte schmutzige Teller
  EN FP: collecting red apples
  de FP: rote Äpfel sammeln
5378 | set (verb): to put something down in a certain place | loc: stellen | translator note: "set the table" = den Tisch decken; kept stellen via placing plates, FS keeps the alarm swap
  EN TS: She is setting the table.
  de TS: Sie stellt Teller auf den Tisch.
  EN FS: She is setting the alarm.
  de FS: Sie stellt den Wecker.
  EN TP: to set the table
  de TP: Teller auf den Tisch stellen
  EN FP: to set an alarm
  de FP: einen Wecker stellen
5379 | alter (verb): to change something to make it different | loc: ändern
  EN TS: The tailor altered the jacket.
  de TS: Der Schneider hat die Jacke geändert.
  EN FS: The tailor altered the shirt.
  de FS: Der Schneider hat das Hemd geändert.
  EN TP: altering a navy jacket
  de TP: ein dunkelblaues Sakko ändern
  EN FP: altering the travel plans
  de FP: die Reisepläne ändern
5381 | conversation (noun): an informal exchange of ideas by speaking | loc: Gespräch
  EN TS: Coffee and a big conversation.
  de TS: Kaffee und ein langes Gespräch.
  EN FS: Beer and a big conversation.
  de FS: Bier und ein langes Gespräch.
  EN TP: a conversation over coffee
  de TP: ein Gespräch bei Kaffee
  EN FP: a conversation by email
  de FP: ein Gespräch per E-Mail
5382 | discuss (verb): to talk about something and examine it | loc: diskutieren
  EN TS: Everyone at the table is discussing it at once!
  de TS: Alle am Tisch diskutieren gleichzeitig!
  EN FS: Everyone on the bus is discussing it at once!
  de FS: Alle im Bus diskutieren gleichzeitig!
  EN TP: discussing at a cafe table
  de TP: am Cafétisch diskutieren
  EN FP: discussing it by phone
  de FP: am Telefon diskutieren
5383 | avenue (noun): a wide street in a town | loc: Boulevard
  EN TS: So many taxis on the avenue!
  de TS: So viele Taxis auf dem Boulevard!
  EN FS: So many buses on the avenue!
  de FS: So viele Busse auf dem Boulevard!
  EN TP: a wide avenue of taxis
  de TP: ein breiter Boulevard voller Taxis
  EN FP: an avenue of old trees
  de FP: ein Boulevard mit alten Bäumen
5384 | champion (noun): someone who won first place in a competition | loc: Meister
  EN TS: The champions are going wild.
  de TS: Die Meister rasten total aus.
  EN FS: The champions are going home.
  de FS: Die Meister gehen nach Hause.
  EN TP: champions in striped shirts
  de TP: Meister in gestreiften Trikots
  EN FP: a champion on a podium
  de FP: ein Meister auf dem Podest
5385 | win (noun): a victory in a race or a competition | loc: Sieg
  EN TS: The rally ends in a win.
  de TS: Der Ballwechsel endet mit einem Sieg.
  EN FS: The rally ends in a loss.
  de FS: Der Ballwechsel endet mit einer Niederlage.
  EN TP: a beach volleyball win
  de TP: ein Sieg im Beachvolleyball
  EN FP: a win at cards
  de FP: ein Sieg beim Kartenspiel
5386 | tear (verb): to separate something by pulling it apart | loc: reißen
  EN TS: She is tearing the contract.
  de TS: Sie zerreißt den Vertrag.
  EN FS: She is tearing the curtains.
  de FS: Sie zerreißt die Vorhänge.
  EN TP: tearing a contract in half
  de TP: einen Vertrag mittendurch reißen
  EN FP: tearing pages from a book
  de FP: Seiten aus einem Buch reißen
5387 | sorrow (noun): deep sadness, especially about a loss | loc: Kummer
  EN TS: They share their sorrow.
  de TS: Sie teilen ihren Kummer.
  EN FS: They share their pizza.
  de FS: Sie teilen ihre Pizza.
  EN TP: sorrow on a sofa
  de TP: Kummer auf dem Sofa
  EN FP: sorrow at a funeral
  de FP: Kummer auf einer Beerdigung
5388 | packet (noun): things wrapped together in one package | loc: Packung
  EN TS: She won the packet of crisps!
  de TS: Sie hat die Packung Chips gewonnen!
  EN FS: She won the packet of sweets!
  de FS: Sie hat die Packung Süßigkeiten gewonnen!
  EN TP: grabbing a packet of crisps
  de TP: eine Packung Chips schnappen
  EN FP: a packet of seeds
  de FP: eine Packung Samen
5389 | dodge (verb): to make a sudden move to avoid something | loc: ausweichen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is dodging her like Messi.
  de TS: Er weicht ihr aus wie Messi.
  EN FS: She is dodging him like Messi.
  de FS: Sie weicht ihm aus wie Messi.
  EN TP: dodging her hands
  de TP: ihren Händen ausweichen
  EN FP: dodging a football
  de FP: einem Fußball ausweichen
5390 | youth (noun): a young person, especially a young man or boy | loc: Jugendlicher
  EN TS: A youth is skating, so cool.
  de TS: Ein Jugendlicher skatet, voll cool.
  EN FS: A youth is cycling, so cool.
  de FS: Ein Jugendlicher fährt Rad, voll cool.
  EN TP: a youth on a skateboard
  de TP: ein Jugendlicher auf dem Skateboard
  EN FP: a youth on a bicycle
  de FP: ein Jugendlicher auf dem Fahrrad
5391 | stare (verb): to look at something for a long time | loc: starren
  EN TS: Nice sunset, they're staring at a phone.
  de TS: Schöner Sonnenuntergang, sie starren aufs Handy.
  EN FS: Nice sunset, they're staring at a book.
  de FS: Schöner Sonnenuntergang, sie starren in ein Buch.
  EN TP: staring at a phone
  de TP: aufs Handy starren
  EN FP: staring at the sunset
  de FP: in den Sonnenuntergang starren
5392 | terror (noun): an overwhelming feeling of fear and worry | loc: Schrecken
  EN TS: They're screaming in terror!
  de TS: Sie schreien vor Schrecken!
  EN FS: They're screaming in a car!
  de FS: Sie schreien in einem Auto!
  EN TP: screaming in terror
  de TP: vor Schrecken schreien
  EN FP: screaming with joy
  de FP: vor Freude schreien
5393 | calm (noun): staying steady in your mind under stress | loc: Ruhe
  EN TS: The T-rex stole her calm.
  de TS: Der T-Rex hat ihr die Ruhe geraubt.
  EN FS: The dog stole her calm.
  de FS: Der Hund hat ihr die Ruhe geraubt.
  EN TP: losing her calm
  de TP: die Ruhe verlieren
  EN FP: keeping her calm
  de FP: die Ruhe bewahren
5394 | claim (verb): to demand something as your own property | loc: beanspruchen
  EN TS: Someone claimed it first!
  de TS: Jemand hat es zuerst beansprucht!
  EN FS: Nobody claimed it first!
  de FS: Niemand hat es zuerst beansprucht!
  EN TP: claiming the frozen land
  de TP: das gefrorene Land beanspruchen
  EN FP: claiming a lost bag
  de FP: eine verlorene Tasche beanspruchen
5395 | ranch (noun): a large farm where cattle are raised | loc: Ranch
  EN TS: A ranch hand is riding along the fence.
  de TS: Ein Ranch-Arbeiter reitet am Zaun entlang.
  EN FS: A ranch hand is riding along the river.
  de FS: Ein Ranch-Arbeiter reitet am Fluss entlang.
  EN TP: a ranch hand riding
  de TP: ein reitender Ranch-Arbeiter
  EN FP: a ranch full of cattle
  de FP: eine Ranch voller Rinder
5396 | mark (verb): to designate a place with a mark | loc: markieren
  EN TS: Orange flags mark the line.
  de TS: Orange Fahnen markieren die Linie.
  EN FS: Blue flags mark the line.
  de FS: Blaue Fahnen markieren die Linie.
  EN TP: marking a line with flags
  de TP: eine Linie mit Fahnen markieren
  EN FP: marking an exam paper
  de FP: eine Klassenarbeit korrigieren
5397 | mighty (adjective): showing great strength or force | loc: gewaltig
  EN TS: One mighty wave, four calm seagulls.
  de TS: Eine gewaltige Welle, vier entspannte Möwen.
  EN FS: One mighty wave, four calm ducks.
  de FS: Eine gewaltige Welle, vier entspannte Enten.
  EN TP: a mighty wave breaking
  de TP: eine gewaltige brechende Welle
  EN FP: a mighty king
  de FP: ein mächtiger König
5398 | chain (noun): a series of things linked together | loc: Kette
  EN TS: People form a human chain.
  de TS: Menschen bilden eine menschliche Kette.
  EN FS: People form a human tower.
  de FS: Menschen bilden einen menschlichen Turm.
  EN TP: a human chain around Earth
  de TP: eine Menschenkette um die Erde
  EN FP: a gold chain necklace
  de FP: eine goldene Halskette
5399 | play (noun): a story that actors perform on a stage | loc: Theaterstück
  EN TS: Two actors are in a play.
  de TS: Zwei Schauspieler spielen in einem Theaterstück.
  EN FS: Two dogs are in a play.
  de FS: Zwei Hunde spielen in einem Theaterstück.
  EN TP: a play in a theatre
  de TP: ein Theaterstück im Theater
  EN FP: a play at school
  de FP: ein Theaterstück in der Schule
5400 | opera (noun): a drama sung to music with an orchestra | loc: Oper
  EN TS: She is at the opera in style.
  de TS: Sie ist stilvoll in der Oper.
  EN FS: She is at the cinema in style.
  de FS: Sie ist stilvoll im Kino.
  EN TP: a night at the opera
  de TP: ein Abend in der Oper
  EN FP: an opera singer
  de FP: eine Opernsängerin
5401 | wonder (verb): to want to know something | loc: sich fragen
  EN TS: Everyone is wondering.
  de TS: Alle fragen sich, was los ist.
  EN FS: Everyone is sleeping.
  de FS: Alle schlafen.
  EN TP: wondering about a problem
  de TP: sich fragen, was los ist
  EN FP: wondering about the weather
  de FP: sich fragen, wie das Wetter wird
5402 | throat (noun): the passage to your stomach and lungs | loc: Hals
  EN TS: She is checking his throat.
  de TS: Sie untersucht seinen Hals.
  EN FS: She is checking his ears.
  de FS: Sie untersucht seine Ohren.
  EN TP: a check of his throat
  de TP: eine Untersuchung seines Halses
  EN FP: a scarf around his throat
  de FP: ein Schal um seinen Hals
5403 | time (noun): what clocks measure, in hours and minutes | loc: Zeit
  EN TS: She is checking the time.
  de TS: Sie checkt die Uhrzeit.
  EN FS: She is checking the map.
  de FS: Sie checkt die Karte.
  EN TP: checking the time
  de TP: die Uhrzeit checken
  EN FP: wasting time
  de FP: Zeit verschwenden
5404 | greedy (adjective): wanting far more money than you need | loc: gierig
  EN TS: He is so greedy with toast!
  de TS: Er ist so gierig beim Toast!
  EN FS: He is so greedy with cake!
  de FS: Er ist so gierig beim Kuchen!
  EN TP: a greedy toast eater
  de TP: ein gieriger Toastesser
  EN FP: a greedy cake eater
  de FP: ein gieriger Kuchenesser
5405 | toddler (noun): a very small child, only a year or two old | loc: Kleinkind
  EN TS: The toddler is walking!
  de TS: Das Kleinkind läuft!
  EN FS: The toddler is crawling!
  de FS: Das Kleinkind krabbelt!
  EN TP: a toddler's first steps
  de TP: die ersten Schritte eines Kleinkinds
  EN FP: a toddler's first words
  de FP: die ersten Wörter eines Kleinkinds
5406 | toe (noun): one of the five small end parts of the foot | loc: Zeh
  EN TS: Her toes are next to a shell.
  de TS: Ihre Zehen sind neben einer Muschel.
  EN FS: Her toes are next to a crab.
  de FS: Ihre Zehen sind neben einer Krabbe.
  EN TP: toes spread in the sand
  de TP: gespreizte Zehen im Sand
  EN FP: toes in a flip-flop
  de FP: Zehen in einem Flip-Flop
5407 | toilet (noun): the bathroom fixture you sit on to pee | loc: Toilette
  EN TS: Everyone needs the toilet now.
  de TS: Alle müssen jetzt dringend auf die Toilette.
  EN FS: Everyone needs the exit now.
  de FS: Alle müssen jetzt dringend zum Ausgang.
  EN TP: a queue for the toilet
  de TP: eine Schlange vor der Toilette
  EN FP: cleaning the toilet
  de FP: die Toilette putzen
5408 | kit (noun): a case holding a set of things you need | loc: Set
  EN TS: The kit solved the chair problem.
  de TS: Das Set hat das Stuhlproblem gelöst.
  EN FS: The kit solved the table problem.
  de FS: Das Set hat das Tischproblem gelöst.
  EN TP: a red tool kit
  de TP: ein rotes Werkzeugset
  EN FP: a first aid kit
  de FP: ein Erste-Hilfe-Set
5409 | tooth (noun): one of the hard white parts in your jaws | loc: Zahn | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is showing her teeth.
  de TS: Sie zeigt ihre Zähne.
  EN FS: She is showing her tongue.
  de FS: Sie zeigt ihre Zunge.
  EN TP: front teeth up close
  de TP: Vorderzähne in Nahaufnahme
  EN FP: a missing front tooth
  de FP: ein fehlender Vorderzahn
5410 | toothbrush (noun): a small brush used for cleaning the teeth | loc: Zahnbürste
  EN TS: He has a green toothbrush.
  de TS: Er hat eine grüne Zahnbürste.
  EN FS: He has a blue toothbrush.
  de FS: Er hat eine blaue Zahnbürste.
  EN TP: a green toothbrush
  de TP: eine grüne Zahnbürste
  EN FP: an electric toothbrush
  de FP: eine elektrische Zahnbürste
5411 | swirl (noun): a curling, spiral shape | loc: Wirbel
  EN TS: He gets a smear, she gets swirls.
  de TS: Er kriegt einen Klecks, sie kriegt Wirbel.
  EN FS: He gets swirls, she gets a smear.
  de FS: Er kriegt Wirbel, sie kriegt einen Klecks.
  EN TP: a swirl of toothpaste
  de TP: ein Wirbel aus Zahnpasta
  EN FP: a swirl of whipped cream
  de FP: ein Wirbel aus Schlagsahne
5412 | pillar (noun): a tall upright post of stone | loc: Säule
  EN TS: Greek pillars, fluted marble.
  de TS: Griechische Säulen, kannelierter Marmor.
  EN FS: Greek pillars, pink marble.
  de FS: Griechische Säulen, rosa Marmor.
  EN TP: huge fluted marble pillars
  de TP: riesige kannelierte Marmorsäulen
  EN FP: a car park pillar
  de FP: eine Säule im Parkhaus
5413 | hopeless (adjective): without hope that things can get better | loc: hoffnungslos
  EN TS: Cars everywhere. Hopeless!
  de TS: Überall Autos. Hoffnungslos!
  EN FS: Bikes everywhere. Hopeless!
  de FS: Überall Fahrräder. Hoffnungslos!
  EN TP: a hopeless traffic jam
  de TP: ein hoffnungsloser Stau
  EN FP: a hopeless football team
  de FP: ein hoffnungsloses Fußballteam
5414 | rail (noun): a barrier made of a horizontal bar on supports | loc: Geländer
  EN TS: He is holding the metal rail.
  de TS: Er hält sich am Metallgeländer fest.
  EN FS: He is holding the metal gate.
  de FS: Er hält sich am Metalltor fest.
  EN TP: the rail of a footbridge
  de TP: das Geländer einer Fußgängerbrücke
  EN FP: a train on the rail
  de FP: ein Zug auf der Schiene
5415 | red (adjective): the color at the end of the spectrum | loc: rot
  EN TS: He is waiting at a red light.
  de TS: Er wartet an einer roten Ampel.
  EN FS: He is waiting at a bus stop.
  de FS: Er wartet an einer Bushaltestelle.
  EN TP: a red traffic light
  de TP: eine rote Ampel
  EN FP: a red stop sign
  de FP: ein rotes Stoppschild
5416 | locomotive (noun): the engine at the front that pulls a train | loc: Lokomotive
  EN TS: She loves that locomotive.
  de TS: Sie liebt diese Lokomotive.
  EN FS: She loves that helicopter.
  de FS: Sie liebt diesen Hubschrauber.
  EN TP: an orange electric locomotive
  de TP: eine orange Elektrolokomotive
  EN FP: an orange steam locomotive
  de FP: eine orange Dampflokomotive
5417 | depot (noun): a place where trams or buses are kept | loc: Depot
  EN TS: The tram ends up in the depot.
  de TS: Die Straßenbahn landet im Depot.
  EN FS: The tram ends up in a museum.
  de FS: Die Straßenbahn landet in einem Museum.
  EN TP: trams in a depot
  de TP: Straßenbahnen in einem Depot
  EN FP: buses in a depot
  de FP: Busse in einem Depot
5418 | interior (noun): the space that is inside of something | loc: Innenraum
  EN TS: The interior is all wood.
  de TS: Der Innenraum ist komplett aus Holz.
  EN FS: The interior is all plastic.
  de FS: Der Innenraum ist komplett aus Plastik.
  EN TP: a wooden tram interior
  de TP: ein hölzerner Straßenbahn-Innenraum
  EN FP: a modern car interior
  de FP: ein moderner Auto-Innenraum
5419 | transfer (noun): moving something from one place to another | loc: Transfer
  EN TS: He makes every transfer.
  de TS: Er schafft jeden Transfer.
  EN FS: He misses every transfer.
  de FS: Er verpasst jeden Transfer.
  EN TP: a transfer to a ferry
  de TP: ein Transfer zur Fähre
  EN FP: a bank transfer
  de FP: eine Banküberweisung
5420 | vessel (noun): a craft built for travel on water | loc: Schiff
  EN TS: He is boarding a white vessel.
  de TS: Er geht an Bord eines weißen Schiffs.
  EN FS: He is boarding a red vessel.
  de FS: Er geht an Bord eines roten Schiffs.
  EN TP: a small passenger vessel
  de TP: ein kleines Passagierschiff
  EN FP: a huge cargo vessel
  de FP: ein riesiges Frachtschiff
5421 | garbage (noun): food and waste thrown out of a kitchen | loc: Müll
  EN TS: The garbage is everywhere!
  de TS: Der Müll ist überall!
  EN FS: The flowers are everywhere!
  de FS: Die Blumen sind überall!
  EN TP: a bin full of garbage
  de TP: eine Tonne voller Müll
  EN FP: a bin full of flowers
  de FP: eine Tonne voller Blumen
5422 | recycling (noun): making new products from used materials | loc: Recycling
  EN TS: Recycling like LeBron.
  de TS: Recycling wie LeBron.
  EN FS: Recycling like Messi.
  de FS: Recycling wie Messi.
  EN TP: throwing into recycling bins
  de TP: in Recyclingtonnen werfen
  EN FP: recycling old clothes
  de FP: alte Klamotten recyceln
5423 | worldwide (adjective): spread out across the entire world | loc: weltweit
  EN TS: His rucksack travels worldwide.
  de TS: Sein Rucksack reist weltweit.
  EN FS: His rucksack stays in one city.
  de FS: Sein Rucksack bleibt in einer Stadt.
  EN TP: travelling worldwide
  de TP: weltweit reisen
  EN FP: a worldwide phone network
  de FP: ein weltweites Handynetz
5424 | treaty (noun): a written agreement between two countries | loc: Vertrag
  EN TS: They signed the treaty.
  de TS: Sie haben den Vertrag unterschrieben.
  EN FS: They tore up the treaty.
  de FS: Sie haben den Vertrag zerrissen.
  EN TP: shaking hands on a treaty
  de TP: Handschlag auf einen Vertrag
  EN FP: tearing up a treaty
  de FP: einen Vertrag zerreißen
5425 | deal (noun): a single instance of buying or selling | loc: Geschäft
  EN TS: The deal is done.
  de TS: Das Geschäft ist unter Dach und Fach.
  EN FS: The deal is off.
  de FS: Das Geschäft ist geplatzt.
  EN TP: signing a big deal
  de TP: ein großes Geschäft abschließen
  EN FP: a deal at the market
  de FP: ein Geschäft auf dem Markt
5426 | delegation (noun): a group of representatives sent somewhere | loc: Delegation
  EN TS: Both delegations have a deal.
  de TS: Beide Delegationen haben eine Einigung.
  EN FS: No delegation has a deal.
  de FS: Keine der Delegationen hat eine Einigung.
  EN TP: two delegations meeting
  de TP: zwei Delegationen treffen sich
  EN FP: a delegation at the airport
  de FP: eine Delegation am Flughafen
5427 | seal (noun): a wax fastener that is soft when warm | loc: Siegel
  EN TS: The envelope has a red seal.
  de TS: Der Umschlag hat ein rotes Siegel.
  EN FS: The envelope has a blue seal.
  de FS: Der Umschlag hat ein blaues Siegel.
  EN TP: a red wax seal
  de TP: ein rotes Wachssiegel
  EN FP: a seal on the beach
  de FP: eine Robbe am Strand
5428 | freight (noun): goods carried by a big truck or ship | loc: Fracht
  EN TS: The truck is bringing freight.
  de TS: Der Lkw bringt Fracht.
  EN FS: The train is bringing freight.
  de FS: Der Zug bringt Fracht.
  EN TP: freight on a big truck
  de TP: Fracht auf einem großen Lkw
  EN FP: freight on a ship
  de FP: Fracht auf einem Schiff
5429 | trust (verb): to have confidence in other people | loc: vertrauen
  EN TS: She trusts them, eyes closed.
  de TS: Sie vertraut ihnen, mit geschlossenen Augen.
  EN FS: She trusts them, eyes open.
  de FS: Sie vertraut ihnen, mit offenen Augen.
  EN TP: trusting the team to catch
  de TP: dem Team beim Auffangen vertrauen
  EN FP: trusting a stranger online
  de FP: einem Fremden online vertrauen
5430 | fast (adjective): moving or able to move very quickly | loc: schnell
  EN TS: She is fast on her road bike.
  de TS: Sie ist schnell auf ihrem Rennrad.
  EN FS: She is fast on her skateboard.
  de FS: Sie ist schnell auf ihrem Skateboard.
  EN TP: a fast ride through tunnels
  de TP: eine schnelle Fahrt durch Tunnel
  EN FP: a fast ride through town
  de FP: eine schnelle Fahrt durch die Stadt
5431 | balloon (noun): a big bag filled with hot air that carries people | loc: Heißluftballon
  EN TS: She is flying in a balloon.
  de TS: Sie fliegt in einem Heißluftballon.
  EN FS: She is flying in a plane.
  de FS: Sie fliegt in einem Flugzeug.
  EN TP: a balloon over rocks
  de TP: ein Heißluftballon über Felsen
  EN FP: a party balloon
  de FP: ein Luftballon für die Party
5432 | trick (verb): to deceive somebody for fun | loc: austricksen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is tricking the poor guy!
  de TS: Er trickst den armen Kerl aus!
  EN FS: He is tricking the poor dog!
  de FS: Er trickst den armen Hund aus!
  EN TP: tricking a customer
  de TP: einen Kunden austricksen
  EN FP: tricking a teacher
  de FP: einen Lehrer austricksen
5433 | turn on (verb): to make something work by flipping a switch | loc: einschalten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is turning on the lights.
  de TS: Er schaltet die Lichter ein.
  EN FS: He is turning off the lights.
  de FS: Er schaltet die Lichter aus.
  EN TP: to turn on fairy lights
  de TP: eine Lichterkette einschalten
  EN FP: to turn on the TV
  de FP: den Fernseher einschalten
5434 | electricity (noun): the energy made by moving electrons | loc: Strom
  EN TS: She is wasting electricity!
  de TS: Sie verschwendet Strom!
  EN FS: She is wasting paper!
  de FS: Sie verschwendet Papier!
  EN TP: using lots of electricity
  de TP: viel Strom verbrauchen
  EN FP: electricity from solar panels
  de FP: Strom aus Solarzellen
5435 | alike (adjective): having the same or similar features | loc: ähnlich
  EN TS: OMG, they dress exactly alike.
  de TS: OMG, ihre Outfits sind sich zum Verwechseln ähnlich.
  EN FS: OMG, they dress differently.
  de FS: OMG, ihre Outfits sind total verschieden.
  EN TP: dressed exactly alike
  de TP: zum Verwechseln ähnlich angezogen
  EN FP: alike in school uniforms
  de FP: ähnlich in Schuluniformen
5436 | twist (verb): to move in a twisting motion | loc: drehen
  EN TS: The team is twisting dough.
  de TS: Das Team dreht Teigstränge.
  EN FS: The team is cutting dough.
  de FS: Das Team schneidet Teigstränge.
  EN TP: twisting a rope of dough
  de TP: einen Teigstrang drehen
  EN FP: twisting a rope of wool
  de FP: einen Wollstrang drehen
5437 | courtyard (noun): an open space with buildings all around it | loc: Innenhof
  EN TS: Party in the courtyard!
  de TS: Party im Innenhof!
  EN FS: Party in the kitchen!
  de FS: Party in der Küche!
  EN TP: a courtyard party with lights
  de TP: eine Innenhofparty mit Lichtern
  EN FP: a school courtyard at break
  de FP: ein Schulhof in der Pause
5438 | filling (noun): any material that fills a space or container | loc: Füllung
  EN TS: A bowl of red filling.
  de TS: Eine Schüssel rote Füllung.
  EN FS: A bowl of green filling.
  de FS: Eine Schüssel grüne Füllung.
  EN TP: red fruit filling
  de TP: rote Fruchtfüllung
  EN FP: a filling at the dentist
  de FP: eine Füllung beim Zahnarzt
5439 | grey (adjective): a color between white and black | loc: grau
  EN TS: Four men, one grey umbrella!
  de TS: Vier Männer, ein grauer Schirm!
  EN FS: Four men, one red umbrella!
  de FS: Vier Männer, ein roter Schirm!
  EN TP: a grey rainy city
  de TP: eine graue, verregnete Stadt
  EN FP: a grey winter coat
  de FP: ein grauer Wintermantel
5440 | nephew (noun): the son of your brother or sister | loc: Neffe
  EN TS: Kite day with his nephew.
  de TS: Drachentag mit seinem Neffen.
  EN FS: Kite day with his dog.
  de FS: Drachentag mit seinem Hund.
  EN TP: flying kites with a nephew
  de TP: mit dem Neffen Drachen steigen lassen
  EN FP: fishing with a nephew
  de FP: mit dem Neffen angeln
5441 | uncle (noun): the brother of your father or mother | loc: Onkel
  EN TS: The uncle let her win.
  de TS: Der Onkel hat sie gewinnen lassen.
  EN FS: The uncle let him win.
  de FS: Der Onkel hat ihn gewinnen lassen.
  EN TP: arm-wrestling with an uncle
  de TP: Armdrücken mit einem Onkel
  EN FP: boxing with an uncle
  de FP: Boxen mit einem Onkel
5442 | sleeve (noun): the part of a garment that covers the arm | loc: Ärmel
  EN TS: He is fighting every sleeve!
  de TS: Er kämpft mit jedem Ärmel!
  EN FS: He is fighting every zip!
  de FS: Er kämpft mit jedem Reißverschluss!
  EN TP: pulling arms out of sleeves
  de TP: Arme aus den Ärmeln ziehen
  EN FP: rolling up the sleeves
  de FP: die Ärmel hochkrempeln
5443 | solidarity (noun): a union of purposes among members of a group | loc: Solidarität
  EN TS: Solidarity fills the street.
  de TS: Solidarität füllt die Straße.
  EN FS: Solidarity fills the stadium.
  de FS: Solidarität füllt das Stadion.
  EN TP: a chain of solidarity
  de TP: eine Kette der Solidarität
  EN FP: a chain of shops
  de FP: eine Ladenkette
5444 | cooperate (verb): to work together on a common project | loc: zusammenarbeiten
  EN TS: They're cooperating on a map.
  de TS: Sie arbeiten an einer Karte zusammen.
  EN FS: They're cooperating on a car.
  de FS: Sie arbeiten an einem Auto zusammen.
  EN TP: cooperating on a puzzle
  de TP: an einem Puzzle zusammenarbeiten
  EN FP: cooperating with the police
  de FP: mit der Polizei zusammenarbeiten
5445 | useless (adjective): having no beneficial use, not working usefully | loc: nutzlos
  EN TS: His umbrella is useless now.
  de TS: Sein Schirm ist jetzt nutzlos.
  EN FS: His briefcase is useless now.
  de FS: Seine Aktentasche ist jetzt nutzlos.
  EN TP: a useless umbrella
  de TP: ein nutzloser Schirm
  EN FP: a useless umbrella in sunshine
  de FP: ein nutzloser Schirm im Sonnenschein
5446 | misty (adjective): covered in thin fog that hides things | loc: neblig
  EN TS: The hills are misty.
  de TS: Die Hügel sind neblig.
  EN FS: The hills are sunny.
  de FS: Die Hügel sind sonnig.
  EN TP: misty hills over a lake
  de TP: neblige Hügel über einem See
  EN FP: misty eyes at a wedding
  de FP: feuchte Augen bei einer Hochzeit
5447 | remote (adjective): located far away in space | loc: abgelegen
  EN TS: This road is very remote.
  de TS: Diese Straße ist sehr abgelegen.
  EN FS: This road is very busy.
  de FS: Diese Straße ist sehr belebt.
  EN TP: a remote desert road
  de TP: eine abgelegene Wüstenstraße
  EN FP: a remote control
  de FP: eine Fernbedienung
5448 | billboard (noun): a huge board above a street where ads are posted | loc: Werbetafel
  EN TS: Billboards on every wall!
  de TS: Werbetafeln an jeder Wand!
  EN FS: Paintings on every wall!
  de FS: Gemälde an jeder Wand!
  EN TP: huge lit billboards
  de TP: riesige beleuchtete Werbetafeln
  EN FP: a billboard in a field
  de FP: eine Werbetafel auf einem Feld
5449 | doorway (noun): the opening in a wall where a door is | loc: Türöffnung
  EN TS: She is in the doorway at last.
  de TS: Endlich steht sie in der Türöffnung.
  EN FS: She is in the garden at last.
  de FS: Endlich steht sie im Garten.
  EN TP: an open stone doorway
  de TP: eine offene steinerne Türöffnung
  EN FP: a doorway with a curtain
  de FP: eine Türöffnung mit Vorhang
5450 | device (noun): a thing invented for a particular purpose | loc: Gerät
  EN TS: Saving money: she is unplugging devices.
  de TS: Geld sparen: Sie zieht bei den Geräten den Stecker.
  EN FS: Saving money: she is plugging in devices.
  de FS: Geld sparen: Sie steckt die Geräte ein.
  EN TP: unplugging every device
  de TP: bei jedem Gerät den Stecker ziehen
  EN FP: charging every device
  de FP: jedes Gerät aufladen
5451 | injection (noun): medicine put into the body with a needle | loc: Injektion
  EN TS: One injection, now he is Hulk!
  de TS: Eine Injektion, jetzt ist er Hulk!
  EN FS: One pill, now he is Hulk!
  de FS: Eine Pille, jetzt ist er Hulk!
  EN TP: an injection in the arm
  de TP: eine Injektion in den Arm
  EN FP: an injection in the leg
  de FP: eine Injektion ins Bein
5452 | peaceful (adjective): not disturbed by fighting or trouble | loc: friedlich
  EN TS: A peaceful lake in the mist.
  de TS: Ein friedlicher See im Nebel.
  EN FS: A peaceful beach in the mist.
  de FS: Ein friedlicher Strand im Nebel.
  EN TP: a peaceful mountain lake
  de TP: ein friedlicher Bergsee
  EN FP: a peaceful mountain village
  de FP: ein friedliches Bergdorf
5453 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: die Vase
  EN TS: She is filling a blue vase.
  de TS: Sie füllt eine blaue Vase.
  EN FS: She is filling a red vase.
  de FS: Sie füllt eine rote Vase.
  EN TP: putting flowers in a vase
  de TP: Blumen in eine Vase stellen
  EN FP: breaking a flower vase
  de FP: eine Blumenvase zerbrechen
5454 | ink (noun): a liquid used for printing or writing | loc: Tinte
  EN TS: Ink is splashing all over the passport.
  de TS: Tinte spritzt über den ganzen Pass.
  EN FS: Water is splashing all over the passport.
  de FS: Wasser spritzt über den ganzen Pass.
  EN TP: black ink drops
  de TP: schwarze Tintentropfen
  EN FP: blue ink on fingers
  de FP: blaue Tinte an den Fingern
5455 | approval (noun): the official act of approving something | loc: Genehmigung
  EN TS: He got the approval!
  de TS: Er hat die Genehmigung bekommen!
  EN FS: He got no approval!
  de FS: Er hat keine Genehmigung bekommen!
  EN TP: approval for a passport
  de TP: eine Genehmigung für den Pass
  EN FP: approval from his parents
  de FP: eine Genehmigung von seinen Eltern
5456 | permission (noun): approval that lets you do something | loc: Erlaubnis
  EN TS: He got permission.
  de TS: Er hat die Erlaubnis bekommen.
  EN FS: He got no permission.
  de FS: Er hat keine Erlaubnis bekommen.
  EN TP: permission to travel
  de TP: Erlaubnis zum Reisen
  EN FP: permission to park
  de FP: Erlaubnis zum Parken
5457 | visitor (noun): someone who comes to visit you | loc: Besucher
  EN TS: The visitors brought a cake.
  de TS: Die Besucher haben einen Kuchen mitgebracht.
  EN FS: The visitors brought a dog.
  de FS: Die Besucher haben einen Hund mitgebracht.
  EN TP: visitors with a cake
  de TP: Besucher mit Kuchen
  EN FP: visitors at a museum
  de FP: Besucher in einem Museum
5458 | vitamin (noun): a substance in food that keeps you healthy | loc: das Vitamin
  EN TS: The vitamin is fizzing like crazy!
  de TS: Das Vitamin sprudelt wie verrückt!
  EN FS: The milk is fizzing like crazy!
  de FS: Die Milch sprudelt wie verrückt!
  EN TP: a fizzing vitamin tablet
  de TP: eine sprudelnde Vitamintablette
  EN FP: a melting vitamin gummy
  de FP: ein schmelzendes Vitamin-Gummibärchen
5459 | lava (noun): melted rock that flows out of a volcano | loc: Lava
  EN TS: Lava on every slope.
  de TS: Lava an jedem Hang.
  EN FS: Snow on every slope.
  de FS: Schnee an jedem Hang.
  EN TP: glowing streams of lava
  de TP: glühende Lavaströme
  EN FP: lava in a lamp
  de FP: Lava in einer Lampe
5460 | sickness (noun): when your body cannot function normally | loc: Übelkeit
  EN TS: The teacups cause sickness!
  de TS: Die Teetassen verursachen Übelkeit!
  EN FS: The big wheel causes sickness!
  de FS: Das Riesenrad verursacht Übelkeit!
  EN TP: sickness after a ride
  de TP: Übelkeit nach einer Fahrt
  EN FP: sickness on a ship
  de FP: Übelkeit auf einem Schiff
5461 | ballot (noun): a document listing the choices you vote for | loc: Stimmzettel
  EN TS: Everyone is posting a ballot.
  de TS: Alle werfen einen Stimmzettel ein.
  EN FS: Everyone is posting a letter.
  de FS: Alle werfen einen Brief ein.
  EN TP: posting a folded ballot
  de TP: einen gefalteten Stimmzettel einwerfen
  EN FP: reading a long ballot
  de FP: einen langen Stimmzettel lesen
5462 | democracy (noun): a system where citizens elect their leaders | loc: Demokratie
  EN TS: Democracy in one plastic box.
  de TS: Demokratie in einer Plastikbox.
  EN FS: Democracy in one wooden box.
  de FS: Demokratie in einer Holzbox.
  EN TP: democracy in action
  de TP: Demokratie in Aktion
  EN FP: democracy on television
  de FP: Demokratie im Fernsehen
5463 | journal (noun): a daily written record of your experiences | loc: Tagebuch
  EN TS: He's journaling at sea. Vibes.
  de TS: Er schreibt Tagebuch auf See. Vibes.
  EN FS: He's journaling in bed. Vibes.
  de FS: Er schreibt Tagebuch im Bett. Vibes.
  EN TP: writing a travel journal
  de TP: ein Reisetagebuch schreiben
  EN FP: reading a science journal
  de FP: eine Fachzeitschrift lesen
5464 | slim (adjective): having a slender, thin body | loc: schlank
  EN TS: She is slim.
  de TS: Sie ist schlank.
  EN FS: He is slim.
  de FS: Er ist schlank.
  EN TP: a slim woman in jeans
  de TP: eine schlanke Frau in Jeans
  EN FP: a slim woman in shorts
  de FP: eine schlanke Frau in Shorts
5465 | waist (noun): the narrow middle of the body above the hips | loc: Taille
  EN TS: Waist measured. Belt fitted.
  de TS: Taille gemessen. Gürtel angepasst.
  EN FS: Arm measured. Belt fitted.
  de FS: Arm gemessen. Gürtel angepasst.
  EN TP: measuring her waist
  de TP: ihre Taille messen
  EN FP: an apron round her waist
  de FP: eine Schürze um ihre Taille
5466 | formal (adjective): following the established rules, like formal dress | loc: förmlich
  EN TS: The waiter looks very formal.
  de TS: Der Kellner wirkt sehr förmlich.
  EN FS: The waiter looks very casual.
  de FS: Der Kellner wirkt sehr lässig.
  EN TP: a formal waiter's uniform
  de TP: eine förmliche Kellneruniform
  EN FP: a formal letter of complaint
  de FP: ein förmlicher Beschwerdebrief
5467 | awake (verb): to stop sleeping and open your eyes | loc: aufwachen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The boy is awaking in shock!
  de TS: Der Junge wacht geschockt auf!
  EN FS: The dog is awaking in shock!
  de FS: Der Hund wacht geschockt auf!
  EN TP: awaking in a bunk bed
  de TP: im Etagenbett aufwachen
  EN FP: awaking in a tent
  de FP: im Zelt aufwachen
5468 | sign (noun): a big board that shows advertisements | loc: Schild
  EN TS: The signs are glowing.
  de TS: Die Schilder leuchten.
  EN FS: The trees are glowing.
  de FS: Die Bäume leuchten.
  EN TP: huge glowing signs
  de TP: riesige leuchtende Schilder
  EN FP: a stop sign
  de FP: ein Stoppschild
5469 | walker (noun): someone who walks for exercise or pleasure | loc: der Spaziergänger
  EN TS: This walker did 10,000 steps!
  de TS: Dieser Spaziergänger hat 10.000 Schritte geschafft!
  EN FS: This walker did 100 steps!
  de FS: Dieser Spaziergänger hat 100 Schritte geschafft!
  EN TP: a walker with Nordic poles
  de TP: ein Spaziergänger mit Nordic-Walking-Stöcken
  EN FP: a walker in the mountains
  de FP: ein Spaziergänger in den Bergen
5471 | level (adjective): flat, with no part higher or lower | loc: waagerecht
  EN TS: The bubble says it's level.
  de TS: Die Blase zeigt: Es ist waagerecht.
  EN FS: The bubble says it's crooked.
  de FS: Die Blase zeigt: Es ist schief.
  EN TP: a level picture frame
  de TP: ein waagerechter Bilderrahmen
  EN FP: a level road
  de FP: eine waagerechte Straße
5472 | bill (noun): a piece of paper money from a bank | loc: Geldschein
  EN TS: The bills are falling out.
  de TS: Die Geldscheine fallen heraus.
  EN FS: The keys are falling out.
  de FS: Die Schlüssel fallen heraus.
  EN TP: bills falling from a wallet
  de TP: Geldscheine fallen aus dem Portemonnaie
  EN FP: bills in a cash machine
  de FP: Geldscheine im Geldautomaten
5473 | wealthy (adjective): having a lot of money and valuable things | loc: wohlhabend
  EN TS: A "wealthy" man with an empty wallet.
  de TS: Ein „wohlhabender“ Mann mit leerem Portemonnaie.
  EN FS: A "wealthy" man with a full wallet.
  de FS: Ein „wohlhabender“ Mann mit vollem Portemonnaie.
  EN TP: a not so wealthy man
  de TP: ein nicht so wohlhabender Mann
  EN FP: a wealthy man's big house
  de FP: die Villa eines wohlhabenden Mannes
5474 | coin (noun): a flat metal piece used as money | loc: Münze
  EN TS: He is sorting his coins.
  de TS: Er sortiert seine Münzen.
  EN FS: He is sorting his cards.
  de FS: Er sortiert seine Karten.
  EN TP: coins from a purse
  de TP: Münzen aus einem Portemonnaie
  EN FP: coins in a fountain
  de FP: Münzen in einem Brunnen
5475 | tank (noun): an armored military vehicle | loc: Panzer
  EN TS: A tank is coming behind them!
  de TS: Hinter ihnen kommt ein Panzer!
  EN FS: A horse is coming behind them!
  de FS: Hinter ihnen kommt ein Pferd!
  EN TP: a tank in the smoke
  de TP: ein Panzer im Rauch
  EN FP: a tank full of water
  de FP: ein Tank voller Wasser
5476 | debris (noun): the bits left when something is destroyed | loc: Trümmer
  EN TS: She is walking over debris.
  de TS: Sie läuft über Trümmer.
  EN FS: She is walking over flowers.
  de FS: Sie läuft über Blumen.
  EN TP: walking through debris
  de TP: durch Trümmer laufen
  EN FP: sweeping up the debris
  de FP: die Trümmer zusammenfegen
5477 | fort (noun): a strong defensive structure | loc: Festung
  EN TS: Best snow fort battle ever.
  de TS: Beste Schlacht um die Schneefestung ever.
  EN FS: Best sand fort battle ever.
  de FS: Beste Schlacht um die Sandfestung ever.
  EN TP: a fort made of snow
  de TP: eine Festung aus Schnee
  EN FP: a fort made of stone
  de FP: eine Festung aus Stein
5478 | stuff (noun): objects of all kinds, not named | loc: Zeug
  EN TS: Her stuff is attacking her!
  de TS: Ihr Zeug greift sie an!
  EN FS: Her books are attacking her!
  de FS: Ihre Bücher greifen sie an!
  EN TP: stuff falling out
  de TP: Zeug fällt heraus
  EN FP: stuff under the bed
  de FP: Zeug unter dem Bett
5479 | robe (noun): a long loose piece of clothing | loc: Gewand
  EN TS: A robe and a "tiny" wardrobe.
  de TS: Ein Gewand und ein „winziger“ Kleiderschrank.
  EN FS: A robe and a "tiny" kitchen.
  de FS: Ein Gewand und eine „winzige“ Küche.
  EN TP: a long satin robe
  de TP: ein langes Satingewand
  EN FP: a hotel spa robe
  de FP: ein Bademantel im Hotel-Spa
5480 | task (noun): a piece of work you take on | loc: Aufgabe
  EN TS: His task is a tower of plates.
  de TS: Seine Aufgabe ist ein Turm aus Tellern.
  EN FS: His task is a tower of shoes.
  de FS: Seine Aufgabe ist ein Turm aus Schuhen.
  EN TP: a hard kitchen task
  de TP: eine schwere Küchenaufgabe
  EN FP: a task at the computer
  de FP: eine Aufgabe am Computer
5481 | pink (adjective): a light shade of red | loc: rosa
  EN TS: Pink hair, white shirt. Phew.
  de TS: Rosa Haare, weißes Shirt. Puh.
  EN FS: Pink hair, pink shirt. Phew.
  de FS: Rosa Haare, rosa Shirt. Puh.
  EN TP: long bright pink hair
  de TP: lange, knallrosa Haare
  EN FP: a pink washing machine
  de FP: eine rosa Waschmaschine
5482 | bath (noun): when you soak and wash your body in a tub | loc: Bad
  EN TS: The dog is having a bath. Spa day!
  de TS: Der Hund nimmt ein Bad. Spa-Tag!
  EN FS: The cat is having a bath. Spa day!
  de FS: Die Katze nimmt ein Bad. Spa-Tag!
  EN TP: a dog in a bath
  de TP: ein Hund im Schaumbad
  EN FP: a dog in a pool
  de FP: ein Hund im Pool
5483 | scan (verb): to examine something closely | loc: absuchen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is scanning the beach. For who?
  de TS: Sie sucht den Strand ab. Nach wem wohl?
  EN FS: She is scanning the forest. For who?
  de FS: Sie sucht den Wald ab. Nach wem wohl?
  EN TP: scanning the shore
  de TP: das Ufer absuchen
  EN FP: scanning a barcode
  de FP: einen Barcode scannen
5484 | gaze (verb): to look at something steadily for a long time | loc: starren
  EN TS: They're gazing at fireworks.
  de TS: Sie starren auf das Feuerwerk.
  EN FS: They're gazing at the sea.
  de FS: Sie starren aufs Meer.
  EN TP: gazing at the sky
  de TP: in den Himmel starren
  EN FP: gazing at the screen
  de FP: auf den Bildschirm starren
5485 | watering can (noun): a container with a spout for watering plants | loc: die Gießkanne
  EN TS: She is using a watering can.
  de TS: Sie benutzt eine Gießkanne.
  EN FS: She is using a garden hose.
  de FS: Sie benutzt einen Gartenschlauch.
  EN TP: a green watering can
  de TP: eine grüne Gießkanne
  EN FP: an empty watering can
  de FP: eine leere Gießkanne
5486 | flowerpot (noun): a clay container that a plant grows in | loc: Blumentopf
  EN TS: He is watering the flowerpot.
  de TS: Er gießt den Blumentopf.
  EN FS: He is painting the flowerpot.
  de FS: Er bemalt den Blumentopf.
  EN TP: a flowerpot on the windowsill
  de TP: ein Blumentopf auf der Fensterbank
  EN FP: a broken flowerpot
  de FP: ein zerbrochener Blumentopf
5487 | surfing (noun): the sport of riding a surfboard on waves | loc: Surfen
  EN TS: Surfing inside a wave is cool!
  de TS: Surfen im Inneren einer Welle ist mega!
  EN FS: Diving inside a wave is cool!
  de FS: Tauchen im Inneren einer Welle ist mega!
  EN TP: surfing a giant wave
  de TP: Surfen auf einer Riesenwelle
  EN FP: surfing the internet
  de FP: Surfen im Internet
5488 | farewell (noun): an expression of goodwill at parting | loc: Abschied
  EN TS: This farewell is taking forever.
  de TS: Dieser Abschied dauert ewig.
  EN FS: This welcome is taking forever.
  de FS: Diese Begrüßung dauert ewig.
  EN TP: a farewell at the port
  de TP: ein Abschied am Hafen
  EN FP: a farewell at the airport
  de FP: ein Abschied am Flughafen
5489 | wear (verb): to be dressed in something | loc: tragen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She wears every coat so well.
  de TS: Sie trägt jeden Mantel so gut.
  EN FS: She wears every suit so well.
  de FS: Sie trägt jeden Anzug so gut.
  EN TP: wearing a feather hat
  de TP: einen Federhut tragen
  EN FP: wearing a straw hat
  de FP: einen Strohhut tragen
5490 | weed (noun): a plant that crowds out garden plants | loc: Unkraut
  EN TS: He pulled out a giant weed!
  de TS: Er hat ein riesiges Unkraut rausgezogen!
  EN FS: He pulled out a giant carrot!
  de FS: Er hat eine riesige Karotte rausgezogen!
  EN TP: pulling out a weed
  de TP: Unkraut ausreißen
  EN FP: a weed in the pavement
  de FP: Unkraut im Gehweg
5491 | welcome (adjective): received with pleasure | loc: willkommen
  EN TS: He is so welcome here!
  de TS: Er ist hier so willkommen!
  EN FS: He is so lonely here!
  de FS: Er ist hier so einsam!
  EN TP: a welcome guest
  de TP: ein willkommener Gast
  EN FP: a welcome break from work
  de FP: eine willkommene Pause von der Arbeit
5492 | spoke (noun): a bar joining a wheel's hub to its rim | loc: Speiche
  EN TS: The wheel has thin spokes.
  de TS: Das Rad hat dünne Speichen.
  EN FS: The wheel has no spokes.
  de FS: Das Rad hat keine Speichen.
  EN TP: thin metal spokes
  de TP: dünne Metallspeichen
  EN FP: thin wooden spokes
  de FP: dünne Holzspeichen
5493 | hub (noun): the central part of a wheel, around the axle | loc: Nabe
  EN TS: He loves every hub he sees.
  de TS: Er liebt jede Nabe, die er sieht.
  EN FS: He loves every car he sees.
  de FS: Er liebt jedes Auto, das er sieht.
  EN TP: the hub of a wheel
  de TP: die Nabe eines Rades
  EN FP: the hub of a city
  de FP: das Zentrum einer Stadt
5494 | disabled (adjective): having a condition that limits what you can do | loc: behindert | translator note: used "mit Behinderung": "behindert" reads as an insult among young German speakers
  EN TS: A disabled man is rolling fast.
  de TS: Ein Mann mit Behinderung rollt schnell.
  EN FS: A disabled man is rolling slowly.
  de FS: Ein Mann mit Behinderung rollt langsam.
  EN TP: a disabled wheelchair user
  de TP: ein Mann mit Behinderung im Rollstuhl
  EN FP: a disabled man on crutches
  de FP: ein Mann mit Behinderung auf Krücken
5495 | rumor (noun): a story passed around by word of mouth | loc: Gerücht
  EN TS: A rumor in the library!
  de TS: Ein Gerücht in der Bibliothek!
  EN FS: A rumor in the kitchen!
  de FS: Ein Gerücht in der Küche!
  EN TP: passing on a rumor
  de TP: ein Gerücht weitererzählen
  EN FP: starting a rumor online
  de FP: online ein Gerücht starten
5496 | adjust (verb): to alter something so that it is just right | loc: anpassen | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc anpassen is wrong for adjusting a tie; used zurechtrücken
  EN TS: She is adjusting his tie.
  de TS: Sie rückt seine Krawatte zurecht.
  EN FS: She is adjusting his hat.
  de FS: Sie rückt seinen Hut zurecht.
  EN TP: adjusting a tie knot
  de TP: einen Krawattenknoten zurechtrücken
  EN FP: adjusting a watch
  de FP: eine Uhr stellen
5497 | candidate (noun): a politician running for public office | loc: Kandidat
  EN TS: The candidate won!
  de TS: Der Kandidat hat gewonnen!
  EN FS: The candidate lost!
  de FS: Der Kandidat hat verloren!
  EN TP: a winning candidate
  de TP: ein siegreicher Kandidat
  EN FP: a losing candidate
  de FP: ein unterlegener Kandidat
5498 | window (noun): the glass opening in the side of a vehicle | loc: Fenster
  EN TS: Every window, a new view!
  de TS: Jedes Fenster, ein neuer Ausblick!
  EN FS: Every door, a new view!
  de FS: Jede Tür, ein neuer Ausblick!
  EN TP: leaning out of a window
  de TP: sich aus dem Fenster lehnen
  EN FP: cleaning a window
  de FP: ein Fenster putzen
5499 | woman (noun): an adult female person | loc: Frau
  EN TS: A woman in red is spinning.
  de TS: Eine Frau in Rot dreht sich.
  EN FS: A woman in red is jogging.
  de FS: Eine Frau in Rot joggt.
  EN TP: a woman watering her flowers
  de TP: eine Frau gießt ihre Blumen
  EN FP: a woman buying flowers
  de FP: eine Frau kauft Blumen
5500 | timber (noun): wood cut and prepared for building | loc: Bauholz
  EN TS: Fresh timber lies in a pile.
  de TS: Frisches Bauholz liegt auf einem Stapel.
  EN FS: Fresh timber lies in a truck.
  de FS: Frisches Bauholz liegt auf einem Lkw.
  EN TP: a pile of fresh timber
  de TP: ein Stapel frisches Bauholz
  EN FP: a truck of fresh timber
  de FP: ein Lkw voll frischem Bauholz
5501 | industry (noun): making goods and services to sell | loc: Industrie
  EN TS: He works in heavy industry.
  de TS: Er arbeitet in der Schwerindustrie.
  EN FS: He works in a flower shop.
  de FS: Er arbeitet in einem Blumenladen.
  EN TP: a heavy industry factory
  de TP: eine Fabrik der Schwerindustrie
  EN FP: the tourist industry
  de FP: die Tourismusindustrie
5502 | storage (noun): the act of storing things somewhere | loc: Lagerung
  EN TS: Boxes are going into storage.
  de TS: Die Kartons kommen zur Lagerung weg.
  EN FS: Boxes are going into the bin.
  de FS: Die Kartons kommen in den Müll.
  EN TP: boxes for storage
  de TP: Kartons zur Lagerung
  EN FP: storage on a phone
  de FP: Speicherplatz auf dem Handy
5503 | position (noun): the way the body and limbs are arranged | loc: Haltung
  EN TS: She is in plank position.
  de TS: Sie ist in der Plank-Haltung.
  EN FS: She is in lotus position.
  de FS: Sie ist in der Lotus-Haltung.
  EN TP: a high plank position
  de TP: eine hohe Plank-Haltung
  EN FP: a position in the company
  de FP: eine Position in der Firma
5504 | send (verb): to cause something to be taken to another place | loc: schicken
  EN TS: She is sending a letter.
  de TS: Sie schickt einen Brief.
  EN FS: She is sending a parcel.
  de FS: Sie schickt ein Paket.
  EN TP: sending a handwritten letter
  de TP: einen handgeschriebenen Brief schicken
  EN FP: sending a text message
  de FP: eine SMS schicken
5505 | film (noun): photographic material you take pictures on | loc: Film
  EN TS: She is studying an X-ray film.
  de TS: Sie studiert einen Röntgenfilm.
  EN FS: She is studying a paper map.
  de FS: Sie studiert eine Papierkarte.
  EN TP: an X-ray film
  de TP: ein Röntgenfilm
  EN FP: a film at the cinema
  de FP: ein Film im Kino
5506 | dance (noun): a party where people meet to dance | loc: Tanzparty
  EN TS: Literally everyone came to this dance.
  de TS: Wirklich alle sind zu dieser Tanzparty gekommen.
  EN FS: Literally nobody came to this dance.
  de FS: Wirklich niemand ist zu dieser Tanzparty gekommen.
  EN TP: a street dance at sunset
  de TP: eine Straßen-Tanzparty bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a dance class at school
  de FP: ein Tanzkurs in der Schule
5507 | zoo (noun): a place where wild animals are kept to see | loc: Zoo
  EN TS: He is having fun at the zoo.
  de TS: Er hat Spaß im Zoo.
  EN FS: He is having fun at the beach.
  de FS: Er hat Spaß am Strand.
  EN TP: a day at the zoo
  de TP: ein Tag im Zoo
  EN FP: a day at the farm
  de FP: ein Tag auf dem Bauernhof
